

                        Disney Animation Studio

                           Table of Contents

1  The Disney History of Animation - From Pencil to Pixel

	The Early Days 1-2
	The Disney Process 1-6
	Roughs 1-6
	The Storyboard 1-7
	Layout 1-8
	In-betweening 1-9
	Final Production 1-10
	The Animator's Challenge 1-11
	Today - The Role of Computer Animation 1-12

2  The Basics

	The Animation Studio Program 2-2
		The Pencil Test 2-3
		Exposure Sheet 2-5
		Ink & Paint 2-6
		Camera 2-7
		Mouse & Keyboard Functions 2-8
		The Help key 2-9

				iii

3  Pencil Test

	Pencil Test Menus 3-2
	Project Menu 3-5
	Edit Menu 3-14
	Brush Menu 3-22
	Tools Menu 3-31
	Preferences 3-43
	Pencil Test Help Key 3-49
	Creating a Pencil Test Animation 3-52
		To Create a Drawing 3-52
		To Create Cel Sequences 3-53
	Testing the Animation Sequence 3-55

4  Exposure Sheet

	Exposure Sheet Menus 4-3
	Project Menu 4-4
	Edit Menu 4-7
	Preview Menu 4-10
	Exposure Sheet Help Key 4-14
	How to Use the Exposure Sheet 4-16
	Creating an Exposure Sheet 4-16
	Adjusting the Frame Rate 4-18

				iv

5  Ink & Paint

	Ink & Paint Elements 5-1
	Project Menu 5-3
	Edit Menu 5-10
	Tools Menu 5-12
	Preferences 5-23
	How to Ink & Paint Your Animation 5-25
	Color Cycling 5-27
	Camera 5-29

6  Putting It All Together

	Generate Ideas 6-1
	Creating A Rough 6-2
	Pencil Test 6-3
	Animating Your Character 6-5
	Basic Animation Techniques 6-10
	Advanced Animation Techniques 6-16
	Try It 6-18

				v

Appendix A - Sound Effects and Music

	Sound Commands A-2
	Score A-2
	Tempo A-3
	Volume A-4
	SFX A-5
	Note A-6
	Stop A-8

Appendix B - File Operations

	File Extensions B-1
	Files to Video B-2

Appendix C - Keyboard Commands

	Pencil Test C-1
	Exposure Sheet C-3
	Ink & Paint C-4

Appendix D - Troubleshooting Checklist

Bibliography

Glossary

Index

				vi

                             Chapter 1

                   The Disney History of Animation

                        From Pencil to Pixel

Snow White, Cinderella, Cruella De Vil, Captain Hook, Peter Pan, Mickey
Mouse, Donald Duck - the list of Disney animated characters goes on and on.
We've laughed and cried with them, and shuddered at their evil ways.  Even
though they are animated, they are so believable that they have become a
part of our memories and culture.

Less than a century ago, who would have thought that drawings could not
only move, but create such feelings and emotions in audiences around the
world?  Yet, thanks to Walt Disney and the animators that worked with him,
animation has reached amazing heights.  The result of his team's efforts is
a style of animation that is truly unique and recognized throughout the
world.

In the following pages you can trace the history of Disney animation - how
it all started and how it's done today.  This understanding may provide you
with some inspiration as you create your own animations with The Animation
Studio.

				1-1

                           The Early Days

The foundations of Disney animation began while Walt Disney was a boy
selling newspapers.  Between 1870 and 1900, newspaper circulation soared in
city areas, and the newspaper cartoon began to change.  Comic strips were
developed which introduced on-going characters and stories.  As the
popularity of the comic strip grew, more artists were attracted to the
field.  It was a short step from the comic strip panel to animation!

Winsor McCay was one of the first artists to take that step.  His
inspiration came from a "flip" book that his son showed him.  Popular with
children at the time, the flip books were a series of drawings cut from a
sheet and rubber banded together.  When the pages were flipped, the
drawings moved.  The result of this inspiration was the creation of "Little
Nemo" in 1911, and "Gertie The Trained Dinosaur" in 1914.

Other artists were experimenting with animation at the same time.  In 1914,
John Bray began printing copies of backgrounds on translucent paper, and
when Earl Hurd patented cel animation in 1915, the Bray-Hurd method of
drawing characters on cels (celluloid sheets) and photographing them
against a single background was born.  This method became the fundamental
process in creating animated films.

Walt Disney was interested in drawing as a child, but due to his family's
many moves, he wasn't able to get a formal art education.  A few years
after graduating from high school, Walt worked for the Kansas City Slide
Company making short animated "gags" for a local theater.  Walt later moved
on to set up his own business, creating a series of fairy tale shorts
called Laugh-O-Grams.  He then combined a live character with animated
figures in the Alice Cartoonland Comedies.  The success of the series lead
Walt to

				1-2

move to Hollywood to join his brother Roy in film directing.  Hollywood
wasn't the easiest place to find work.  Discouraged by his poor luck, Walt
set up an animation studio in his uncle's garage, and created more Alice
cartoons.  The cartoon series was successful enough for Walt to set up a
small studio, and entice his friends from Kansas City to join him in
Hollywood to help with this new and exciting business.  But the popularity
of the Alice cartoons began to fade, and a businessman by the name of
Charles Mintz was pressing Walt to create a new cartoon character. 
Although "Oswald, The Lucky Rabbit" was a success, Mintz demanded more
cartoons for reduced payments, and Mintz finally cut Walt out of all rights
to Oswald.

It was at this low point in Walt Disney's career that Mickey Mouse was
born.  Walt was on a train returning from a meeting with Charles Mitz in
New York when he began to sketch a funny little mouse that somewhat
resembled Oswald, The Lucky Rabbit.  The mouse was initially named Mortimer,
but Walt's wife Lillian quickly renamed the character Mickey.  The
character's personality was the result of Walt's inspiration, while the
familiar physical appearance was the work of Ub Iwerks, one of Walt's
friends from Kansas City.  Mickey couldn't have appeared at a better time
for Walt and his small group.

While beginning work on two cartoons, sound was introduced to the film
industry.  Walt realized that the future of films included sound, so he
decided to drop everything to create a cartoon with a synchronized sound
track.

The staff began intense work on "Steamboat Willie", inventing the sound
synchronized process as they went by scoring the crude sound track with
beats precisely timed to match the movements on the screen.  Walt knew that
the illusion would only work if the sound track was perfectly synchronized
and seemed to come from the characters.  The staff performed test runs,
adding music and sound effects, until the result was convincing.  And sure

				1-3

enough, the audiences were convinced.  "Steamboat Willie" premiered on
November 18, 1928 and was an instant success.  Not only was the spunky
little mouse a star, Walt and his staff pushed animation into a new and
exciting phase of growth.  Quickly becoming adept at synchronization,
Disney began work in 1929 on the now-classic "Silly Symphonies", a series
of cartoons combining music and animation.

In 1932, Disney again broke ground with the Silly Symphony "Flowers and
Trees", the first cartoon in full color, and with the huge success of
"Three Little Pigs" (1933), the animators' growing skill at
characterization and story structure was evident.  Not only did the film
present characters with defined personalities in a clever, well-written
story, but it was also the first time a song was written specifically for a
cartoon.  Frank Churchill's tune, "Who's Afraid of the Big Bad Wolf?" was
as big a hit as the cartoon itself.

Throughout this period, the Disney artists continued to train, taking art
classes at the studio.  To aid in story development, Walt created his story
department in 1931, and during that time introduced the use of storyboards.
Storyboards remain a crucial tool in the development of every cartoon to
this day.  They are large boards, somewhat like a comic strip on which
sketches showing every stage of the action, story, and character
development can be displayed for discussion, revision, rejection, and
finally, production.

With these and other technical developments in place, the Disney staff was
prepared to take on their next "impossible" challenge: the creation of a
full-length animated feature.  In the twenty-five years since Little Nemo's
appearance, the Disney animators had made amazing advances in the art,
learning to tell structured, interesting stories, create characters with
detailed personalities, and give them the illusion of real, lifelike
movement.  But until now, they had mainly worked with animals and objects
as their stars, and the stories were limited in length.  Was the Disney
staff

				1-4

advanced enough to animate convincing human beings?  Could they tell a
story that would hold the audience's attention for a full hour or more? 
Hollywood didn't think so, and Walt's newest project was scoffingly called
"Disney's Folly."

Work officially started on "Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs" in 1934. 
Seven hundred and fifty artists eventually worked on the film, making some
two million sketches.  It was a labor of love from start to finish, with
attention paid to every aspect of development.  Capturing the essence of
human movement in a believable was was an enormous challenge for the
animators, who studied films and worked with actresses, actors, and
dancers.  Many types of animals on the lot provided models for Snow White's
forest friends.  Technical problems were encountered and solved along the
way, and again, the studio invented and refined new processes and
techniques as the film progressed.  "Snow White" had more depth in its
backgrounds and settings than its predecessors.  The multi-plane camera was
used to shoot layers of action and background at the same time.

The entire project was a huge gamble for Disney, with every step presenting
new challenges.  But on December 21, 1937, when "Snow White and the Seven
Dwarfs" opened in Hollywood, the gamble paid off sensationally, becoming
the top grossing film of that time.  Today, over 50 years later, "Snow
White" continues to delight and amaze audiences, and has earned a place in
film and animation history.  Its most important achievements were in
storytelling, character development, and the animation of the human form. 
The standards and techniques created and fine-tuned in "Snow White" have
been used by Disney in all of the 27 full-length Disney animated features,
and by other animated film makers everywhere.

				1-5

                         The Disney Process

Today, the basic stages in the making of a feature film are the same as
those followed in creating "Snow White."  The story idea is the first step
in the Disney process. Whether inspired by a classic book, a well-known
fairy tale, or an original idea, the first step usually starts with the
question, "What if...?"  As the story idea is developed, a script is
drafted, rough sketches of characters are "story boarded" to provide a
framework and springboard for more ideas.  Gradually, from the piles of
drawings and ideas, characters emerge, relationships develop, and action
falls into place.

			      Roughs

While the story idea is developing, inspirational art begins.  Artists
research and create concepts for settings, costume, color, and design that
will give the film its style and flavor, whether it's the uptown chic of
"Oliver and Company" or the gothic romance of "Sleeping Beauty". 
Meanwhile, character artists continue to create and refine the rough
character sketches, working to capture the characters' personalities in
their physical appearance.  Under the guidance of a director, the story is
scripted, and a rough sound track recorded for the animators to use.  The
voice actors and actresses chosen for the film play an important role in
the way characters sound, look and behave.  All of the elements - from
scripts to character drawings and inspirational art - are completed before
moving on to storyboarding.

				1-6

                           The Storyboard

Like a very detailed comic strip, storyboards allow the film makers to
incorporate visual cartoon action that would be difficult to describe. 
Storyboarding provides the opportunity to actually "picture" the film,
which cannot be achieved with the words of a traditional script.  All of
the ideas are brought together and reworked until the complete film is
shown in a series of still drawings.

These drawings are refined and corrected, then numbered and filmed to
become the story reel.  The story reel will also be revised, corrected,
reshot, and retested many times as the creative team works for proper
timing, correct development of ideas and gags, good staging, and exciting,
believable characters.  Eventually, the storyboard becomes the final
"shooting script" of an animated film.

				1-7

                              Layout

Once the major story sequence is defined, final voice casting completed,
and a final sound track recorded, the artists will "flesh out" ideas,
creating hundreds of small details that bring the characters and the story
to life on the screen.  At this stage, layout artists compose the scenes in
which the characters will act, providing the staging for entrances, exits,
and other movements.  layouts go to the animators who will animate the
action.  Pencil drawings of the layouts also go to the background artists
to begin creating final artwork.

				1-8

                           In-betweening

Completed Disney animation is rich in variety and detail, and includes many
steps in its creation.  Animators create the main "acting poses" for each
character's movement on screen.  Each action a character makes has a
beginning and ending pose, gesture, or expression, which are clearly
defined by the animators.  These main poses must capture the characters'
personalities, moods, emotions, and the intent and purpose of the action.

After the main poses are complete, "in-betweeners" draw the subtle
transition movements in between each pose.  These in-between drawings also
add to the detailed richness of the overall animation.

				1-9

                           Final Production

Eventually, the rough pencil drawings are cleaned up (redrawn with sharp,
clear lines) before going on for inking and painting.  Characters are drawn
in ink and then painted on a sheet of clear acetate known as a cel.  The
character cels are photographed over the separate background paintings. 
Cels may be reshot, retested, and revised as needed until the entire film
is ready for final editing.

It may take anywhere from two to four years after the "What if?" stage
before a new Disney animated full-length feature film is ready for release.

				1-10

                        The Animator's Challenge

From synchronized sound, storyboards and the multi-plane camera, to the
first use of color, the color Xerox and computer animation in films such as
"The Great Mouse Detective" and "Oliver and Company", the Walt Disney
Studios has created, invented, or utilized technical developments in
animation throughout its history.  But as interesting as they are,
technical advances are only as good as the artists who use them.  They give
the animators the mechanical freedom and flexibility for what they must do
in every sketch or final drawing - act!

Each Disney animator is an actor who brings to each drawing a keen
understanding of how people and animals feel and express those feelings
through movements, gestures, and expressions.  Creating believable
characters means playing out their roles, just as if the animator were in
front of the camera or on stage.  Excellent artistry and exciting new
technical achievements are vital, but they are not enough.  Without the
animators' ability to capture and convey the full range of a character's
emotions, the final result would be beautiful, but without feeling.

But Disney animation has heart.  And that is Disney's single greatest
contribution to the world of animation - the one that has earned Disney
animation an unchallenged place in film history and in the hearts of
generations worldwide.  From evil witches to devil-may-care bears,
beautiful mermaid princesses to courageous mice, flying elephants to
operatic whales, Disney characters are much more than lovely drawings on a
screen.  They are alive and real to those who watch them.  It is this
quality of life and the indefinable thing called "heart" that is the magic
and essence of the art of Disney animation.

				1-11

               Today - The Role of Computer Animation

As in "Oliver and Company", "The Great Mouse Detective", and "The Little
Mermaid", computer animation is being used more and more in animated films
to create special effects.  Computer animation allows animators the freedom
to create one drawing, and use that drawing repeatedly to create special
effects or to save time that would have been spent redrawing the picture
over and over again.

For example, the animator may need to draw only one bubble on the computer
screen, copy, resize, and slightly vary it in order to create an underwater
effect that would have taken hours to complete.  Using computer animation,
the animator can dedicate more time to drawing detailed characters and
animation.  Although computer animation can be used for many things in the
animation industry, Disney animation is founded on the hand-drawn, detailed
characters that are so believable and lifelike.

The Animation Studio provides a number of benefits that make home computer
animation easy and fun.  The Animation Studio allows you to create a
drawing and then turn it or a section of it into a "brush". Using the brush
feature, you can duplicate the image as many times as you like, on the same
cel or on a series of cels, and then rotate, flip or resize the image. 
Using standard animation techniques, you would have to redraw the image
each time you needed to change its size, placement, or appearance.

Another feature of The Animation Studio is the ability to easily erase a
section of your drawing.  If you make a mistake or decide to change the
drawing, you can easily erase the section, and

				1-12

redraw what you need.  With hand-drawn images on cels, animators have to
redraw the picture on another cel - they don't have the ability to erase
part of a cel and redraw part of the image.  Your drawings can be easily
scaled down, make larger, wider, or taller.

With The Animation Studio, you can continually and instantly test your
animation.  Once you have created a number of cels, you may want to check
the movement and progression of your animation.  Instant color changes to
your animation are also easy to accomplish.  Through the Ink & Paint
section of the program, you instantly test different colors on your
drawings or change a color through the use of the palette.  The
possibilities are endless with The Animation Studio.

				1-13

                              Chapter 2

                             The Basics

This Chapter describes the contents and basics of The Animation Studio. 
The Animation Studio contains 3 disks:

	* Programs/Samples/SoundFX
	* Morgue - Reference Animations
	* Demo-Reel

When these disks are inserted into your Amiga, the icon names appear as:

	* STUDIO
	* MORGUE
	* DEMO-REEL

The STUDIO disk contains The Animation Studio program, a library of sample
animations, and a sound effects file.  The MORGUE disk contains samples of
actual Disney animations called Reference animations.  The DEMO-REEL
contains a black & white and color animation of Donald Duck, created
specifically for The Animation Studio, and another animation complete with
color and sound.

				2-1

                    The Animation Studio Program

The Animation Studio program lets you perform processes similar to those
used in the animation industry.  The Animation Studio program sections are:

	* Pencil Test
	* Exposure Sheet
	* Ink & Paint
	* Camera

To open The Animation Studio program, double-click on The Animation Studio
icon titles TAS.  TAS is a "supervisor" program that lets you access Ink &
Paint from Pencil Test, and vice versa.  The program opens to the Pencil
Test screen.  If you are working on a low memory system, you do not have
enough memory to use the TAS program; enter the Pencil Test through the
CLI.

To enter Pencil Test through the CLI:

	1. Press and hold [Ctrl] [d] while the computer boots off of your
	   STUDIO work disk.  The CLI prompt is displayed.

	2. At the CLI prompt, type Pencil-Test to start The Animation
	   Studio.  This technique saves valuable memory.

				2-2

The Pencil Test

The Pencil Test provides all the tools necessary to create a black and
white animation.  The screen looks like:

                    Figure 2-1. Pencil Test Screen

The strip along the top of the screen is called the menu bar.  Menus are a
list of choices that allow you to select an action.  The words Cel 1 of 1
appear in white in the menu bar.  When the right mouse button is pressed,
menu titles are listed in the menu bar.  To select a menu, move the mouse
pointer to the menu bar and hold down the right mouse button.  The menu
title highlights and the menu items appear below it.

				2-3

      Figure 2-2. Pencil Test Screen with Menu Titles Displayed

To select a menu item, drag the mouse pointer down to the menu item and
release the mouse button.  Some menu items have a double arrow symbol (>>)
to the right of the menu item.  This symbol means that there is a submenu
for that option.  Drag the mouse pointer to the right and down to highlight
the submenu item.  Release the mouse button to select the highlighted item.
Some menu items display requesters, which are windows that require input
from you.  Each of the Pencil Test menus, submenus, and requesters are
described in detail in the Pencil Test chapter.

The Toolbox is the collection of symbols along the right side of the
screen.  The symbols in the Toolbox represent commonly used drawing tools
that allow you to create, edit, and test your animation.  You can select a
tool by moving the mouse pointer over the tool and clicking the left mouse
button.  You can hide

				2-4

the Toolbox and menu bar while working on your animation by pressing the
[F10] key located on the top row of the keyboard.  The [F10] key toggles
the Toolbox and menu bar off and on.  Each of the Pencil Test tools are
described in the Pencil Test chapter.

The large white area that takes up most of the screen represents a cel.  A
cel in the animation industry is a single piece of artwork, usually drawn
on a clear piece of acetate, celluloid, or onion skin paper.  In The
Animation Studio, the cel on the screen is a lot like a hand-drawn piece of
art on onion skin paper.  The Animation Studio allows you to produce layers
of drawings and create an onion skin effect, which means that you can
create a series of layers, and see through four layers of drawings.  As you
overlay more drawings, the previous cels become lighter.

Exposure Sheet

The Exposure Sheet is accessed through the Pencil Test Project menu.  In
traditional animation, the exposure sheet is a guideline by which the
animators set up timing and the order of events.  The Animation Studio
Exposure Sheet additionally lists events such as sound effects and music,
and determines the timing of actions and sounds.  The Exposure Sheet uses
specific commands to control the timing, sounds, and music, as described in
Chapter 4 - Exposure Sheet.

				2-5

                 Figure 2-3. Exposure Sheet Screen

Ink & Paint

The Ink & Paint section of the program allows you to add color and
backgrounds to your animation.  This section can be accessed through the
Pencil Test Project menu.  If you are working on a low memory system, do
not open Ink & Paint from Pencil Test, or vice versa.  Open the Ink & Paint
program separately by typing Ink-&-Paint at the CLI prompt.

				2-6

The Ink & Paint section displays a window similar to the Pencil Test
window.

                   Figure 2-4.  Ink & Paint Screen

Notice that the menu bar and Toolbox in the Ink & Paint section are similar
to those in the Pencil Test section.  The color palette, located below the
Toolbox, allows you to select the colors you would like to use in your
animation, as well as mix your own colors and create other effects using
the Ink & Paint options.  There is no onion skin effect in Ink & Paint.

Camera

The Camera functions provide you with the tools necessary to merge Pencil
Test animations with backgrounds created in The Animation Studio as well as
other paint packages.  Refer to the Ink & Paint chapter for more
information on Camera and Ink & Paint operations.

				2-7

Mouse and Keyboard Functions

This section describes the functions of the mouse and keyboard.  The left
and right mouse buttons are used to perform different functions.

Use the left mouse button to:

	* open The Animation Studio disk icon
	* open The Animation Studio program icon
	* select tools from the Toolbox
	* select a drawing or sections of a drawing as a brush
	* select items or add information to a requester (such as the
	  color or frame rate requester)
	* draw
	* stop an animation and return to the cel you were on when you
	  began animating.

Use the right mouse button to:
	
	* display menu titles in the menu bar
	* pull down the menus from the menu bar
	* select menu items
	* draw in white (white circles, lines, or rectangles, for example)
	* stop an animation on the current cel

Many of the mouse and pull-down menu functions can be accessed with
keyboard commands.  Once you become more familiar with The Animation
Studio, using keyboard commands can be a faster and more efficient way to
create animations.  The Tools menus in both the Pencil Test and Ink & Paint
sections list the tools and corresponding keyboard commands.  Refer to
Appendix C for a quick reference list of tools and corresponding keyboard
commands.

				2-8

The Help Key

Pressing the Help key on the Amiga keyboard displays a window that lists
the function - key commands, and the corresponding actions supported by The
Animation Studio.  A Help Screen is available no matter where you are in
the program.

				2-9

                             Chapter 3

                            Pencil Test

The Pencil Test section includes all the tools necessary to create, edit,
save, and run a black and white animation.  This chapter describes the
Pencil Test menus, tools, and operations required to:

	* create rough drawings
	* use the onion skin effect to create animations
	* run and test your animation.

The Pencil Test section also allows you to create an exposure sheet to
arrange the timing of cels and incorporate sound effects and music for your
animation.  A detailed discussion of the Exposure Sheet is provided in the
next chapter.  The Ink & Paint section is also accessed through the Pencil
Test menus, and is discussed in Chapter 5.

				3-1

                         Pencil Test Menus

Double-click on The Animation Studio icon to display the Pencil Test
screen.  In a low memory system you may double-click on the Pencil Test
icon to open the Pencil Test separately.

	           Figure 3-1. Pencil Test Screen

The menu bar along the top of the cel editor reads Cel 1 of 1 showing the
current cel or "page" number.  To see the Pencil Test menu titles, move the
mouse pointer to the menu bar and hold the right button down.

				3-2

                 Figure 3-2. Pencil Test Menu Titles

The Pencil Test menus are:

	* Project
	* Edit
	* Brush
	* Tools
	* Preferences

The Project menu lets you perform file operations, such as opening and
saving files, enter the Exposure Sheet and Ink & Paint portion of the
program, run your animation, and quit the Pencil Test program when you're
done.

The Edit menu lists the functions available to edit your animation.  The
keyboard commands are also provided in the menu listing.

				3-3

The Brush menu lists the options available when working with a brush image.
You can rotate, resize, and flip the image, as well as load brushes from
other software packages.

The Tools menu provides a listing of the items in the Toolbox and their
corresponding keyboard commands.  You may select tools through the Tools
menu, the Toolbox on the Pencil Test screen, or corresponding keyboard
commands.  Refer to the Tools menu or Appendix C to learn the keyboard
commands.

The Preferences menu lets you select the colors that appear on screen,
select the resolution of the display, set the frame rate for the animation,
display a coordinate system on screen, and turn the Toolbox off and on.

The following sections describe each of the menus in detail.

				3-4

                           Project Menu

To access the Project menu, move the mouse pointer to the Project menu
title and hold the right mouse button down.  Slide the mouse pointer down
to highlight Project menu items.  Release the mouse button on the menu item
you want to select.

              Figure 3-3.  Pencil Test Project Menu

New

Select New to clear all current cels and start a new animation.  Before the
cels are cleared, a requester asks if you are sure.

				3-5

             Figure 3-4.  Project Menu New Requester

If you want to begin a new animation, click on OK with your left mouse
button.  If you want to continue working on the current cels, select
Cancel.  If you have created a drawing, used the exposure sheet, and
decided to clear the cels, another requester asks if you want to delete the
exposure sheet.

	Keyboard command: N

				3-6

           Figure 3-5. Delete Exposure Sheet Requester

Open

Select Open to load an animation into The Animation Studio.  The animation
can be one of three formats:

	* IFF
	* Anim
	* CFast

Many of the paint packages created for the Amiga use the IFF file format. 
Iff and Anim files are standard file formats used in other software
packages that can be opened and used in The Animation Studio.  Once these
files are opened in The Animation Studio, they can be saved as CFast files,
a file format used in The

				3-7

Animation Studio.  Files created or brought into The Animation Studio can
be saved as CFast files, Anim files, or a series of IFF files.  Each file
format is described in Appendix B.

Opening a File

When you select Open and the file format from the submenu, the File
requester displays:

		Figure 3-6. File Requester

The requester opens to the fill size of the screen.  The top bar of the
requester tells you the file type.  For example, if you selected 
Open>>CFast, the top bar reads Open CFast...  The next line down displays
the current drawer.  If this box is blank, either a drawer is not selected,
or you are at the top level of your current directory.  For detailed
information on the Amiga file structure, refer to the Amiga documentation
supplied with your computer.

				3-8

The box in the center of the requester displays the files, directories, and
disk volumes currently available on the system.  This listing varies
depending on the disks you have loaded in the drive(s) and any information
on the system's hard disk.  The size of each file is provided to the right
of the file name.

The Parent and Volume boxes allow you to move around on your disk to locate
files and directories.  Clicking on Parent takes you up the file structure
and back to the disk volume listing.  Clicking on Volume lets you see which
volumes (disks) are available on your system.

You can open a file in three ways:

	* double-click on the file name in the center listing.

	* Type the file name into the File box and click on Load.  If you
	  make a mistake while typing, use the backspace or Del key, or
	  press the right (A) and (x) keys simultaneously to erase the
	  edit field.

	* Select the file name by clicking on it, and then click on Load.

It is a good idea to check the size of the file to be sure that you have
enough memory to load the file.

The Animation Studio will automatically load animations of any resolution. 
If you attempt to load a file with a resolution different from that of the
display, a requester asks you if you want to change the format of the
screen so the file can be loaded.  The Open command functions similarly in
all sections of The Animation Studio program.  Note that selecting Open
clears the current animation before loading the new one.

	Keyboard command: o (to open Cfast)

				3-9

Append

Append is similar to Open except that Append does not clear the current
cels before opening a selected file.  Use Append when you want to combine
two or more animations into a single animation.  The file selected through
the requester is added to the end of the current cels.  In addition, the
exposure sheet of the selected file is added to the end of the current
exposure sheet.  The appended information is automatically renumbered. 
Otherwise, the Append requester looks and functions like the Open
requester.

	Keyboard command: none

Save

Select Save to save the current animation on disk.  Selecting Save assumes
that a file name was provided in the Load requester, or that a previous
save was made using the Save As menu item.  If a file name has not been
assigned to the current file, the requester asks if it is OK to save the
current file as Untitled.

		Figure 3-7. Save As Untitled Requester

				3-10

You may accept the filename in the box, or select Cancel and then Save As
from the Project menu to assign a file name to the file and save it.  If
the current file already has a file name, selecting Save saves the latest
changes or additions to the file, and saves the file in the file format
specified previously.

	Keyboard command: 5

Save As

Select Save As to save a new animation, or save an animation with a new
name.  Selecting Save As displays the Save As requester.  If the current
file has not been saved, the file name box displays Untitled.  Enter the
new file name.  The requester also displays the file format at the top of
the requester.  Prior to saving the file, check the space available on your
work disk to be sure that there is enough space to save the file.  The
amount of space on the volume is displayed at the bottom of the requester.

	Keyboard command: w (to save as Cfast)

		Figure 3-8. Save As Requester

				3-11

Exposure Sheet

Select Exposure Sheet to open the exposure sheet.  The Animation Studio
Exposure Sheet is similar to the exposure sheet used in the animation
industry.  The exposure sheet lets you plan the timing of the animation,
arrange the sequence of cels, and orchestrate music and sound effects.  The
exposure sheet is automatically attached to the animation once the exposure
sheet is created.  Refer to Chapter 4 - Exposure Sheet for detailed
information.

	Keyboard command: F6

Animate

Select Animate to play the cels in sequential order.  The animation
continues to play until you press one of the mouse buttons.  If you press
the right mouse button, the animation stops on the current cel.  This is
very useful when testing an animation and attempting to find and fix any
problems.  pressing the left mouse button stops the animation and returns
to the starting cel.  For instance, if you start on cel 5, select Animate,
and press the left mouse button, the animation stops and returns to cel 5. 
If you hold (Shift) and press (a), the animation runs according to the
exposure sheet.  Press (a) to run the animation in the current order.

	Keyboard command: a or A

Ink & Paint

Select Ink & Paint to enter the Ink & Paint program

	Keyboard command: F5

About

Selecting About displays the software version number and copyright
information.

	Keyboard command: ?

				3-12

Quit

Select Quit to exit the program, and return to the Workbench.  A requester
displays:

		     Figure 3-9. Quit Requester

Select OK to quit the program.  Select Cancel to remain in the program and
in the current file.

	Keyboard command: ESC

				3-13

                              Edit Menu

To access the Edit menu, move the mouse pointer to the menu bar and hold
the right button.  Slide the mouse pointer to display Edit menu items.

                       Figure 3-10. Edit Menu

Undo

Select Undo to erase your last action.  For example, if you draw a large
circle, then draw a smaller circle inside the larger circle and select
Undo, the smaller circle disappears.  Note that you can undo any command,
including an Undo command.

	Keyboard command: u

				3-14

Restore

Select Restore to return the cel its original state.  Restore can erase a
number of additions or changes made to a drawing, whereas Undo only erases
the last change made.

	Keyboard command: U

Swap

Select Swap to exchange the current cel with the cel stored in the swap
screen.  Selecting Swap when the swap screen is empty seems to clear the
current screen, when it actually swapped the current screen for the blank
swap screen.  You may draw something on the blank swap screen and select
Swap again to return to the original cel.  Selecting Swap repeatedly
alternates between the original cel and the swap screen.

The Swap technique is useful for creating in-between drawings.  If, for
example, you wanted to draw a falling ball, you could:

	1. Draw a circle at the top of cel 1.

	2. Draw a circle at the bottom of cel 2.  The screen now looks
	   like Figure 3-11.

				3-15

 		Figure 3-11. Cels 1 and 2 of Swap Example

	3. Move to cel 3.  Notice that the first two cels can be seen
	   clearly through the onion skin effect.

	4. Create the middle circle on cel 3.  The screen now looks like
	   Figure 3-12.

				3-16

		Figure 3-12. Cels 1, 2 and 3 of Swap Example

The sequence of cels is out of order.  You need to swap the position of
cels 2 and 3.

	5. Select Swap from the Edit menu.  The circle drawn on cel 3 is
	   exchanged with the Swap screen, so cel 3 now looks blank.

	6. Move back to cel 2. Select Swap from the Edit menu.  The
	   middle circle appears and is now recognized as cel 2.

	7. Move to cel 3 and select Swap again.  Cel 3 is now the bottom
	   circle and the circles should be in the correct order.  The
	   screen now looks like Figure 3-13.

				3-17

		Figure 3-13. Complete Swap Example

Use this technique to create in-between drawings for your animation.  This
technique can also be accomplished by substituting the j key for the Swap
menu option.

	Keyboard command: j

Invert

Select Invert to reverse the black and white in the current image or
animation.  This option is useful when loading Anim files from other
applications.  Anim files from other applications load inverted.  Select
Invert to restore the animation to its original state.  Invert is also
useful for creating special effects such as night scenes.

	Keyboard command: ~

				3-18

Cleanup

Select Cleanup to remove any stray, single black pixels from the current
cel.  Digitized images often have stray pixels.  This command easily
removes them.

	Keyboard command: F7

Insert

Select Insert to add a blank cel to your animation.  If you select Insert
in the middle of a series of cels, a new cel inserts on the current cel
number and "bumps" the additional cels forward.  For example, if you are
currently on cel 2 of a sequence of three cels, and you select Insert from
the Edit menu, a blank cel is inserted as cel 2.  Cel 2 then becomes cel 3,
and cel 3 becomes cel 4.  The exposure sheet is automatically updated when
Insert is selected.

	Keyboard command: i

Delete

Select Delete to delete the current cel from the sequence of cels.  If the
current cel is used in the exposure sheet, a requester displays asking you
if you want to delete this cel from the exposure sheet.  If you select OK
from the requester, the current cel is deleted, the exposure sheet is
updated, and the sequence of cels is updated.  The cels following the
deleted cel are "bumped" downward in order.  It is possible to delete a lot
of work with this key, so use it carefully.

	Keyboard command: DEL

Copy

Select Copy to make a duplicate of the current cel.  The current cel is
then stored in memory.  This option is normally used with the Paste menu
option.

	Keyboard command: O

				3-19

Paste

Select Paste to replace the current cel with the cel in memory.  (Refer to
the Copy command.)  If the current cel has a drawing on it, the drawing is
erased and the pasted cel appears.  Copying and moving forward one cel, and
then pasting the cel down again is a simple way to create progressive
animations.  A progressive animation is an animation that is consistently
added to.  For example, you may have an element such as a tree that has
leaves added to it over a series of cels.  You can create a drawing of a
tree, copy it, and continue to paste it as you move forward through a
sequence of cels.  Using this technique, you do not have to redraw the
entire picture over and over again.  The leaves can also be modified
(rotated or resized) using the brush techniques described in the Brush menu
section of this chapter.

	Keyboard command: P

Clear

Select Clear to erase the drawing on the current cel.  The cel number and
sequence remain the same.

	Keyboard command: K

Goto

Selecting Goto displays a requester that allows you to move to a selected
cel.  Select the cel number by typing the cel number in the top box, or
slide the horizontal scroll bar at the bottom of the requester using the
mouse.  For example, if you want to move to cel 10, type the number 10 in
the box and select OK.

	Keyboard command: g

Load Cel

Select Load Cel to load a single IFF picture.  Selecting Load cel displays
a requester that allows you to enter the file name of the IFF picture you
want to load.  This feature is useful in loading a

				3-20

background picture into the pencil test.  Use the background image as a
guide while creating the animation.  When a background is loaded into
pencil test animation, it appears as a black and white image.  You may
place this image on the swap screen, and use the swap screen technique to
use the background as reference.  If there is already an image on the cel
and you select Load Cel, the selected image replaces the cel image.

	Keyboard command: none

Save Cel

Select Save Cel to save the current cel as a single IFF file.  This picture
can be used as a background image, and can ce loaded into The Animation
Studio later as a reference image.

	Keyboard command: none

				3-21

                             Brush Menu

To access the Brush menu, move the mouse to the menu bar and hold the right
button down.  Slide the mouse to display Brush menu items.

		      Figure 3-14. Brush Menu

Load

Select Load to load previously saved IFF brushes from The Animation Studio
or other software packages, such as Deluxe Paint.  Use Load to bring in a
brush image that you want to use in the current pencil test animation.

	Keyboard command: none

Save

Select Save to save the current brush image.  Selecting Save displays a
requester that asks you to assign a file name to the brush image.  This
brush can then be used in other animations and cels using the Load command.

	Keyboard command: none

				3-22

Rotate

Select Rotate to rotate a selected brush by 45R[R , 90R[R , or any desired angle.
The preset degree rotations are provided to make it easier to rotate a
selected brush.  The submenu Any Angle allows you to rotate the brush any
degree.  The 45R[R  command does not continually rotate the brush image.  You
will need to alternate with the 90R[R  command to continually rotate the
image.

	Keyboard commands:
		45R[R : $
		90R[R : (

Resize

Select Resize to resize the selected brush.  The Resize option provides the
following submenu choices: Halve, Double, Wider, Taller, and Size

The examples used in each of the submenu descriptions are based on the
following original brush image:

			Figure 3-15. Brush Image

				3-23

	Halve
	Select Halve to size the brush image in half (by 50%).

	Keyboard command: h

			Figure 3-16. Halved Image

	Double
	Select Double to double the size of the brush image.

	Keyboard command: H

				3-24

			Figure 3-17. Doubled Image

	Wider
	Select Wider to double the brush image in the horizontal direction
	only.  The vertical size of the brush remains the same.

	Keyboard command: X

				3-25

			Figure 3-18. Wider Image

	Taller
	Select Taller to double the brush image in the vertical direction
	only.  The horizontal size of the brush remains the same.

	Keyboard command: Y

				3-26

			Figure 3-19. Taller Image

	Size
	Select Size to size the brush image any way you like.  Once a brush
	image is made, select Size from the Brush menu.  Move the mouse
	pointer back to the cel area and hold down the left or right mouse
	button.  Drag the image to any size in any direction that you like.
 	To place the brush image, release the mouse button and position the
	brush on the cel.

	Keyboard command: Z

Flip

Selecting Flip allows you to create mirror images of a brush.  The
following submenu options are available:

				3-27

	Horizontal
	Select Horizontal from the Flip option to flip the brush image
	horizontally (to the side).  Refer to Figure 3-15 for the original
	image.

	Keyboard command: x

			Figure 3-20. Horizontal Flip

	Vertical
	Select Vertical from the Flip option to flip the brush vertically.

	Keyboard command: y

				3-28

			Figure 3-21. Vertical Flip

Grab From

Select Grab From to instruct the mouse pointer to grab the brush image from
the center or a selected corner.  The submenus Center and Corner display
when you select Grab From.  If Corner is selected, the pointer will move to
the corner where the mouse was last positioned.  If you make a change in
this menu, only the brush images selected after the change are affected.

	Keyboard command: none

Font

Use the Font command to select the font you want to use with the text
command.  This command has several submenus:

	Load
	Selecting Load displays the Load requester.  This requester lists
	all of the fonts available on your system, and the point sizes
	available.  Click on the point size of the font you would like to
	use.

				3-29

	The Animation Studio looks for fonts in the system directory 
	called fonts:.  If you wish to increase the number of fonts 
	available, be sure to move them into this directory.

		B = Bold font

		I = Italicized font

		U = Underlined font

		P = Proportional font

		T = The font was designed to be used on a screen that is
	            wider than it is tall. (On a 640x200 screen).

		W = The font was designed to be used on a screen that is
		    taller than it is wide. (On a 320x400 screen).

		X = Extended

	Keyboard command: T

	Flush Fonts
	As you load fonts with the Fonts command, they are loaded into
	memory and used by the Text command.  When you are finished using
	the Text command, you can free up this wasted memory by selecting
	Flush Fonts.

	Bold
	Select Bold to make the current font bold.

				3-30

	Italics
	Select Italics to make the current font italicized.

	Underline
	Select Underline to underline the current font.

			     Tools Menu

To access the Tools menu, move the mouse pointer to the menu bar and hold
the right button.  Slide the mouse pointer to display Tools menu items. 
This section describes the icons displayed in the Tools menu as well as
those in the Toolbox.

			Figure 3-22. Tools Menu

				3-31

The tools listed in the Tools menu correspond to the tools displayed in the
Toolbox on the right side of the screen.  Selecting Tools from the Tools
menu functions the same as selecting the tools from the Toolbox.  You may
reference the Tools menu to learn the corresponding keyboard commands.

                        +-----|-----+
 Freehand line -------> |     |     | <----- Dotted Line
                        |-----|-----|
    Line -------------> |     |     | <----- Curve
                        |-----|-----|
    Circle -----------> |     |     | <----- Ellipse
                        |-----|-----|
  Rectangle ----------> |     |     | <----- Text
                        |-----|-----|
   Fill --------------> |     |     | <----- Brush
                        |-----|-----|
   Clear -------------> |     |     | <----- Undo
                        |-----|-----|

                        +-----|-----+
 Magnify -------------> |     |     | <----- Zoom
                        |-----|-----|
 Copy to Buffer ------> |     |     | <----- Copy from Buffer
                        |-----|-----|
 Delete Cel ----------> |     |     | <----- Insert Blank Cel
                        |-----|-----|
 Back Arrow ----------> |     |     | <----- Forward Arrow
                        |-----|-----|
 Projector -----------> |     |     | <----- Exposure Sheet
                        +-----|-----+

		     Figure 3-23. Toolbox

				3-32

When the Toolbox is displayed on screen, single-stepping through an
animation is slowed down.  Pressing the [F10] key on your keyboard toggles
the menu bar off or on.  Selecting Toolbox from the Preferences menu also
toggles the Toolbox off and on.

This section discusses each of the tools in the Toolbox and Tools menu, and
provides the keyboard commands listed in the Tools menu.

Freehand Line

The Freehand Line tool lets you draw freehand lines in either white or
black.  Click on the tool or select the icon from the Tools menu and move
the mouse pointer onto the cel area.  Hold the left mouse button down and
drag the mouse to create black lines.  Hold the right mouse button down and
drag the mouse to create white lines.  (You won't be able to see the white
lines if you are working on a white background.)

	Keyboard command: d

		  Figure 3-24. Freehand Line Example

				3-33

Dotted Line

The Dotted Line tool is similar to the Freehand Line tool.  It allows you
to draw freehand dotted lines in either white or black.  Click on the tool
or select the icon from the Tools menu.  Move the mouse pointer onto the
cel area, hold the left mouse button down, and move the mouse to create
black dotted lines.  Hold the right mouse button down and drag the mouse to
create white dotted lines.  The Dotted Line tool is good for creating
sketches, or to work out ideas on the screen.

	Keyboard command: s

Line

The Line tool lets you draw straight lines anywhere on the screen.  Click
on the tool or select the icon from the Tools menu.  Move the mouse pointer
on to the cel area and hold the left mouse button down while dragging the
mouse.  Release the mouse button when you are done drawing the line.  Hold
the right mouse button down to create straight white lines.

	Keyboard command: v

Curve

The Curve tool allows you to select two points, (like the line tool), and
move the mouse to create curved lines and arcs.  Click on the tool in the
Toolbox, or select the icon from the Tools menu.  Hold the left mouse
button down and move the mouse to create a black line.  Release the mouse
button when the line is a long as you want it.  When you release the mouse
button and move the mouse, the line will bend, creating a curved line. 
Click the mouse button once to complete the curve.  Select the Curve tool
and hold the right mouse button down to create a white curved line.

	Keyboard command: q

				3-34

Circle

The Circle tool lets you draw outline or filled circles.  Click on the
upper half of the circle from the Toolbox or select the outline circle from
the Tools menu to create outline circles.  Select the bottom half of the
icon or the filled circle from the Tools menu to create filled circles. 
Move the mouse pointer to the cel area, hold the mouse button down, and
move the mouse to create the circle.  Use the left mouse button to create
black circles, and the right mouse button to create white circles.

	Keyboard commands:
		Outline Circle: c
		Filled Circle: C

Ellipse

The Ellipse tool lets you draw white and black outline or filled ellipses. 
use the left mouse button to create black ellipses, and the right mouse
button to create white ellipses.  Click on the upper half of the Ellipse
tool in the Toolbox or select the outline ellipse from the Tools menu to
create outline ellipses.  Once the tool is selected, move the pointer to
the cel area.  Press and hold the appropriate mouse button to specify the
center of the ellipse.  As you drag the mouse a line forms.  This line
determines the angle of the ellipse.  Drag the mouse to specify the angle,
and release the mouse button.  Now when you move the mouse, the ellipse
takes shape along the specified angle and around the selected center. 
Click to finalize the shape and position of your ellipse.  Select the
bottom half of the Ellipse icon or the filled ellipse from the Tools menu
to create filled ellipses.

	Keyboard commands:
		Outline Ellipse: e
		Filled Ellipse: E

				3-35

Rectangle

The Rectangle tool allows you to draw outline or filled rectangles and
squares.  Click on the upper half of the rectangle in the Toolbox or select
the outline rectangle from the Tools menu to create outline rectangles. 
Click on the bottom half of the tool, or select the filled box from the
Tools menu.  The Rectangle tool is very similar to the Circle and Ellipse
tools.  Move the mouse pointer to the cel area, press the mouse button to
set one corner, and drag the mouse to the opposite corner and release the
button to create rectangles or squares.

Keyboard commands:
	Outline Rectangle: r
	Filled Rectangle: R

Text

The Text tool lets you place text characters and character strings on the
cel.  Select the Text tool from the Toolbox, and click the mouse pointer on
the screen.  Use the left mouse button to type in black, and the right
mouse button to type in white.  A box displays, and you may begin to type
characters from the keyboard.  The font that appears on screen is the font
currently selected in the computer memory.

To change this font, select Font >>Load from the Brush menu.  The Font
requester displays and lists the available fonts.  Select the font that you
want, close the requester by clicking on the Load box in the lower left
corner of the requester window, and select the Text tool from the Toolbox
(if it isn't already selected).  To deselect the Text tool, either select
another tool, or press [ESC].  If you make a mistake while typing, use the
backspace key to delete characters.

				3-36

Text strings and characters are just like drawings created with any of the
other tools.  Therefore, images created using the Text tool can be selected
as a brush, moved, rotated, resized, etc.  After typing a line of text,
press the Return key to begin another line of text.

	Keyboard command: t

Fill

The Fill tool is used to fill an area or a shape with black or white.  To
create a black cel, select the Fill tool from the Toolbox or from the Tools
menu, and click on the cel area with the left mouse button.  To return to
white, click on the cel with the right mouse button.

Use the same technique to fill shapes and drawings, but be aware that the
shape must be completely closed, (all corners and ends must meet), in order
for the shape to fill correctly.  If the shape is not closed, the rest of
the drawing or screen will fill also.

	Keyboard command: f

Brush

The Brush tool is a very powerful tool that lets you select part of the cel
image and use it as a brush.  The image can be a drawing or text.  Select
the Brush tool from the Toolbox or from the Tools menu and move the mouse
pointer onto the cel.  Hold the left mouse button down and drag the
rectangular box to select the part of the cel you want to make into a
brush.  This image is now copied to the brush, which means that the
original image remains on the cel.  If the right mouse button is used to
select the brush, the selected image is lifted onto the brush and off the
current cel.

				3-37

Once an image is made into a brush, it can be placed on any cel by moving
to the cel and clicking the mouse button to place the image on the cel. 
You can also hold the mouse button down and drag the image to create
special effects.  Press and hold the left mouse button to create a black
image of the brush, or press the right mouse button to create a white image
of the brush.  The brush will work with the Freehand Line, Dotted Line,
Line, Curve, Circle, Ellipse and Rectangle Tools, just as a single pixel
does normally.

To deselect a brush:

	1. Move the mouse pointer to the lower right corner of the 
	   screen and press the left mouse button, or

	2. Press the period (.) key.

	Keyboard command: b

				3-38

		Figure 3-26. Duplicated Brush Example

CLR

The CLR tool lets you clear or erase the current cel.  The cel is not
removed from the animation.

	Keyboard command: K

Undo

The Undo tool erases or undoes your last action, only if you haven't
clicked the mouse in between your last action and the selection of the Undo
icon.  If you click Undo twice, your last action remains intact.  Using the
Undo tool is identical to selecting the Undo menu item.

	Keyboard command: u

				3-39

Magnify

Select the Magnify tool from the Toolbox to enlarge a selected area of the
cel image.  Clicking once on the Magnify tool displays a small rectangular
box on the screen.  Moving this box to an area of the drawing and clicking
once selects that section of the image.

The screen is divided in half by a gray bar.  The magnified image is
displayed on one half of the screen, while the other half of the screen
displays the original image.  Once the section of the image is magnified,
you can use the mouse to edit the drawing by adding or removing "pixels". 
Pixels, which is short for "picture elements", are the tiny white and black
dots on the screen which create the picture.  Use the left mouse button to
add black pixels, or the right mouse button to add white pixels.  Hold
[Shift] down and press the arrow keys to move the image in the Magnify
window while the mouse pointer is in the magnified portion of the screen. 
When using the keyboard command, place the mouse pointer on the area you
want to magnify.

	Keyboard command: m

Zoom

Repeatedly clicking on the top half of the Zoom icon zooms in on the
magnified image.  Clicking on the bottom half of the icon zooms out on the
image.  This tool is useful when using the Magnify tool to edit a section
of a drawing.

	Keyboard command:
		Zoom In: >
		Zoom Out: <

Copy to Buffer

Selecting this icon is identical to selecting Copy from the Edit menu.  The
current cel remains in sequence and is copied to a temporary buffer in the
computer memory.  This tool is often used with the Copy from Buffer tool.

	Keyboard command: O

				3-40

Copy from Buffer

Select Copy from Buffer to paste the image stored in the computer memory on
the current cel.  This tool is identical to the Edit menu Paste command,
and is often used with the Copy to Buffer tool.

	Keyboard command: P

Delete Cel

This tool is identical to the Delete option in the Edit menu.  Select the
Delete Cel icon to delete the current cel.  The following cels are bumped
down in sequence and the exposure sheet is automatically updated.

	Keyboard command: DEL

Insert Blank Cel

Select the Insert Blank Cel icon to add a blank cel to the sequence.  A
blank cel is inserted as the current cel number and the following cels are
moved ahead in sequence.

	Keyboard command: i

Back Arrow

Select the Back Arrow tool to move back through the cel sequence.  You can
move back through the sequence until you reach the beginning of the cel
sequence (cel 1).

	Keyboard command: Left Arrow

				3-41

Forward Arrow

Select the Forward Arrow icon to add and/or advance one cel ahead.  Press
[F3] to lock the current number of cels.  This feature is called the Loop
Lock, which prevents the number of cels in the current animation from
increasing.  If you lock the current animation with the [F3] key, you can
use the forward arrow key to single-step through the animation without
accidentally adding cels.

	Keyboard command: Right Arrow

Projector

Select the Projector icon to animate the cels in their current order.  This
tool does not animate the file according to the exposure sheet.  This tool
is good for frequently testing your animation as you create the sequence of
cels and images.

	Keyboard command: a

Exposure Sheet

Select the Exposure Sheet tool to quickly open the current exposure sheet
for the sequence of cels displayed.  Using this tool is identical to
selecting the Exposure Sheet option from the Project menu.  For more
information on the exposure sheet, refer to the Exposure Sheet chapter.

	Keyboard command: F6

				3-42

                             Preferences

To access the Preference menu, move the mouse to the menu bar, hold the
right button, and slide the mouse to display the menu items.

		    Figure 3-25. Preferences Menu

				3-43

Screen Format

Selecting Screen Format displays:

		  Figure 3-26. Screen Format Requester

Screen Format allows you to select the screen resolution, and page size. 
The screen resolution you select depends on the quality and amount of
detail you want to use.  Selecting High Resolution takes more memory and
more time to animate.  High Resolution cannot be selected on a 512K System.

The middle of the Screen Format requester allows you to specify the X and Y
size for the page format.  Click on the plus or minus sign to add or
subtract from the number displayed in the middle box.  The overscan
capability allows you to draw on areas beyond the screen edges.  Click on
Normal to select the default page size.  Click on Standard or Severe to
overscan the edges of the screen and decrease the screen border area.

				3-44

Frame Rate

Selecting Frame Rate displays the Frame Rate requester.  This requester
allows you to set the rate at which the cels of your animation are played
back when you animate.  Select the Projector tool or the Animate menu
option to run the cels according to the specified frame rate.

	          Figure 3-27. Frame Rate Requester

The default frame rate is set to 12 frames per second.  You can also select
15, 24, or 30 frames per second from the requester, or specify your own
custom frame rate.  Traditional animations are run at 24 frames/second, but
you may want to set the frame rate slower, especially when testing your
animation.

The Frame Rate requester also allows you to enforce the selected frame
rate.  This is the sure way to animate at the frame rate you specify. 
Enforced frame rate uses an accurate internal clock to verify exact frame
timing.  The animation stops if the program is unable to maintain the
requested frame rate due to other background programs or interrupts.  The
minimum frame rate you can

				3-45

set is 1, and the maximum is 30.  You may exit the requester without
animating, or exit the requester and immediately animate the current cel
sequence.

	Keyboard command: F

Set Colors

Selecting Set Colors displays the Set Colors requester.  This requester
allows you to set the pen and screen colors on your monitor, as well as the
gray values of the onion skin effect.

		   Figure 3-28. Set Colors Requester

The R, G, and B boxes in the bars in the top right corner of the requester
slide to the left and the right, adding or subtracting red, green, and
blue.  You can adjust the color of the pen on the screen as well as the
color of the cel background by selecting either the Paper or Pen box to the
left of the RGB controls.  Adjust the colors for both the pen and the
background so they are comfortable on your eyes.

				3-46

The four boxes at the bottom of the requester represent the shades of gray
achieved with the onion skin effect.  Click on one of the boxes, and adjust
the gray by clicking the mouse in the bar above the four gray boxes. 
Usually, the shades of gray get darker as you go from left to right, so the
bottom layers are lighter than the top layers when using the onion skin
effect.  The top cel is usually black so that you can easily see the
current cel.

Select OK to set the colors, or Cancel to quit the requester.

Fade Colors

Selecting Fade Colors presents the following options:

	Invert
	Select invert to reverse the black and white in the image.

	Keyboard command: !

	Fade In
	Select Fade In to increase the onion skin effect and make the
	onion skin paper "more transparent".  The Fade In technique is
	the reverse of Fade Out, and corresponds to the ] key on the
	keyboard.

	Keyboard command: ]

	Fade Out
	Select Fade Out to decrease the onion skin effect and make the 
	onion skin paper "less transparent".  This menu command 
	corresponds to the [ bracket key on the keyboard.  With each
	consecutive press of the [ key, the sequence will continue to
	fade, from the back to the front, until the front cel is reached.
	The image on the top cel remains black.  Use the Fade out option
	to reduce the onion skin effect for clarity in complex drawings.

	Keyboard command: [

				3-47

Set 0,0

Select Set 0,0 to set the X, Y origin on the screen.  Move the mouse to the
screen and click the mouse button where you would like 0,0 to reside. 
Points selected to the left and above the X, Y placement are displayed as
negative numbers.

Coords

Select Coords to have the X, Y screen coordinate system displayed in the
upper right part of the screen as you move the mouse on the screen.  Using
the coordinate system permits accurate measurements to be made of objects,
and allows the creation of symmetrical drawings. A check mark appears next
to the menu item if Coords is turned on.

	Keyboard command: | (vertical bar)

Show Load

Select Show Load to have an animation display as it is loading.  If an
animation is long, this allows you to see that the computer is working, and
lets you see how far along the load of the animation is at a glance.  A
check mark appears next to the menu item if this feature is turned on.

Toolbox

Select Toolbox to toggle the Toolbox on the right side of the screen off
and on.  The first time you select Toolbox from the Preferences menu, the
Toolbox turns off.  A check mark appears next to the menu item if the
Toolbox is turned on.  This option is useful if you are familiar with
keyboard commands, and you would like to use the entire width of the screen
to create your animation.  Also, if the Toolbox is displayed, it slows down
the single-stepping of animations.

				3-48

                        Pencil Test Help Key

The Pencil Test provides a Help screen that lists the actions of the
function keys, and other special features of the Pencil Test not described
in the Pencil Test menus.  To access the help screen, simply press the
Amiga Help key located on the Amiga keyboard.  Click on the OK at the
bottom of the window to close the Help screen.

                 Figure 3-29. Pencil Test Help Screen

Another way to see what is available to you is to display the menus and
menu items.  This allows you to browse the options available without making
any selection.  This is also a good way to become familiar with the
keyboard commands in the menus.

				3-49

Back/Forward One Cel

Press the Left Arrow key to move back one cel.  Press the Right Arrow key
to move forward one cel.

First/Last Cel

Press the Up Arrow key to move to the first cel of the animation.  Press
the Down Arrow Key to move to the last cel of the animation.

Copy and Advance One Cel

Press [Return] to copy the contents of the current cel and paste them on
the following cel.

Display Memory Free/Used

Press [F1] to display the amount of free memory, and the amount currently
used by the program.  This information displays in the title bar.  To turn
this feature off you may advance one more cel, or move back one cel.  The
amount of free memory is divided into Chip(C) and Fast(F).

Toggle Onion Effect

Press [F2] to toggle the onion skin effect off and on.  Selecting this
option allows the current cel to display without the previous cels showing
through to the current cel.

Toggle Loop Lock

Select [F3] to set the total number of cels in the sequence to the number
currently created.  You cannot add new cels to the sequence with the arrow
keys while this option is on.  (New cels can be added by using the Insert
New Cel command.)  This option allows you to walk through the sequence of
cels using the arrow keys and loop back to cel 1 when the end of the series
is reached.  If this option is off and you would like to walk through the
sequence using the Forward Arrow key, you will add blank cels to the end of
the sequence unless you stop on the last cel in the sequence.

				3-50

SetJump to Cel

Select [F4] and then a number key to assign a drawing to one of the number
keys on the keyboard.  By pressing a number key the cel associated with
that key will be displayed when you hold the key down.  You can set a total
of ten different drawings to the number keys using the SetJump to Cel
command.  This feature is useful when you need to see black and white
versions of the background as references while creating the animation.

Transfer to Ink & Paint

Press [F5] to enter the Ink & Paint program.  This function key only works
if you entered the Pencil Test from The Animation Studio program.

Enter Exposure Sheet

Press [F6] to enter the Exposure Sheet.

Clean Up Cel

Press [F7] to clean stray pixels from the current cel.

Toggle Mouse Pointer

Select [F8] to toggle the screen display of the mouse pointer off and on.

Toggle Menu Bar

Press [F9] to toggle the display of the menu bar off and on.  This is
useful if you are familiar with the keyboard commands and you wish to see
the upper area of the cel.

Toggle Menu Bar and Toolbox

Select [F10] to toggle the menu bar and Toolbox off and on.  This lets you
see the entire cel.

Delete Current Cel

Press [Del] to delete the current cel.  Use with caution.

				3-51

                  Creating a Pencil Test Animation

Now that you are familiar with the Pencil Test tools and menus, you are
ready to create drawings and animations.  The tools and specific
techniques that you use depend on the type of animation you want to create.
 Perhaps you want to draw a character using freehand lines, or create an
object using circles and rectangles.  The actual step-by-step procedures
that you perform will vary.  This section provides the general steps to
follow in creating and testing your animation, as well as some tips and
techniques that you can use once you feel comfortable with the Pencil Test
basics.

                        To Create a Drawing

	1. Select a tool from the Toolbox by clicking once on the tool
	   icon. Click on the top half of the "split" icons to create
	   outlines, or on the bottom half to create filled shapes.

	2. Move the mouse pointer to the cel area.

	3. Begin to create the object or character on cel 1.

	4. If you make a mistake, you can select Undo (which cancels your
	   last action), or CLR (which erases the current cel).

				3-52

                      To Create Cel Sequences

	1. Perform steps 1 through 4 on page 3-52 to create your first
	   drawing.

	2. To create the next drawing on cel 2, depending on the
	   differences between cel 1 and cel 2, there are a number of ways
	   to create the sequence of cels:

	* Use the onion skin effect to hand draw the character or object
	  again on cel 2 using the tools from the Toolbox, making the
	  slight changes needed to create the illusion of movement.

	* Copy cel 1 using the Return key.  The Return key copies the
	  current cel and advances to the next cel.  That image is
	  automatically pasted on the following cel.  Use the filled
	  Rectangle tool and the right mouse button to create a white
	  rectangle that can be used as an eraser if you need to edit
 	  the image on cel 2.

	* Copy the image on cel 1 as a brush, create cel 2 by pressing
	  the Right Arrow key, and continue to make adjustments to your
	  character or object to create movement and animation.

The changes you make as you step through the cels may be as simple as
changing the placement of the object on screen, or as elaborate as moving
the character's hands and changing the facial expressions.  That decision
is up to you.  One of the best features of The Animation Studio is that you
can be as creative and detailed as you like, no matter what your level of
animation expertise.  The key is your imagination!

				3-53

It is important to create a number of cels in the sequence.  Depending on
the type of movement, different animations require a different number of
cels to create smooth and believable movement.

The different types of movement are:

	* The movement of simple objects, such as a bouncing ball.

	* Limited animation, where certain parts of the animation
	  moves, while other parts are duplicated from cel to cel

	* Disney-style animation, which imitates the real movement of
	  objects and people.

The movement of simple objects is discussed in The Animation Studio Getting
Started manual.  The object practically remains in the same form throughout
the animation, while the placement of the object on the cel is what
provides the illusion of movement.

Limited animation is a type of animation used mostly in Saturday morning
cartoons.  it is a technique that limits the amount of the character's
movements.  The main part of the character is copied from cel to cel, while
just the mouth, or perhaps only the arms and legs are changed to create the
illusion of talking or walking.  This manual provides a mouth chart for you
to reference if you want to try your hand at limited animation.  The mouth
chart shows different mouth types and expressions for you to reference when
creating a talking character.  It is provided to generate ideas for your
own animation.  Refer to Chapter 6 - Putting it All Together.

				3-54

Disney animation imitates real movement, as it exists in life.  During the
creation of a Disney animation, the animators look at people, animals, and
objects to create believable and lifelike movement.  This takes time and
patience, but the result is beautiful.  If you are interested in creating
Disney-style animations, be sure to read Chapter 6 - Putting It All
Together and refer to the sample animations provided on the MORGUE and
STUDIO disks of The Animation Studio package.  Also refer to the
Bibliography provided in this manual, which lists reference books used by
animators to learn about movement, animation, and industry terminology.

Creating a Limited or Full animation may take more cels than you would
think.  So don't be afraid to generate 20, 40, or 60 cels, if that is what
it takes to create your animation.

                  Testing the Animation Sequence

You should continually test your animation sequence as you create cels to
be sure that the movement and result of your efforts is what you expect. 
It is very useful in finding the areas that perhaps aren't quite right, or
the areas where you may need to add more cels to make the animation more
believable and smooth.

				3-55

Test your animation:

	1. Move the mouse pointer to the Projector tool in the Toolbox.

	2. Click the Projector tool.  The animation will start, beginning
	   with cel 1.  It will continue to loop, or go through the
	   sequence of cels until you tell it to stop.

	3. To stop the animation, click either mouse button.

At this point you may want to rerun the animation at a slower rate so you
can clearly see the progression of cels.  To adjust the Frame Rate:

	1. Move the mouse pointer to the Preferences menu.

	2. Select Frame Rate.

	3. Select or enter the frame rate.  You may want to run the
	   animation at 6 or 8 frames per second while testing the cel
	   sequences.

	4. Select Exit & Animate from the requester to run the animation
	   again at the slower speed.

	5. Click either mouse button again to stop the animation.

Once you feel comfortable with the animation you have created and tested,
you can move on to creating the exposure sheet for your animation.

				3-56

                             Chapter 6

                           Exposure Sheet

Once you have successfully created a pencil test animation, you are
prepared to create the exposure sheet for that animation.  The Animation
Studio Exposure Sheet is accessed through the Pencil Test Project menu, and
is similar to a worksheet, or a list of things to do and when to do them. 
It allows you to order the cels and create the proper timing for your
animation, as well as incorporate sound effects and music.  Once you learn
how to use the Exposure Sheet, you will find it a very useful tool in the
creation of interesting and fun animations.

Traditional animation relies on the exposure sheet as a guide to filming
the animation.  The information on the exposure sheet provides the
instructions on how to shoot the film.  Similarly, The Animation Studio
Exposure Sheet provides you with the tools needed to create effective
timing and sound effects.

This chapter describes The Animation Studio Exposure Sheet menus and
options, and provides instructions on how to coordinate the Exposure Sheet
with your animation.  A list of commands used to control the animation is
included, as well as a description of the Exposure Sheet Help Key. 
Commands used to incorporate sound effects and music are discussed, and a
list of the sound commands are provided in Appendix A - Sound Effects and
Music.

				4-1

When you select the menu item Exposure Sheet from the Pencil Test Project
menu, the screen opens to the full size of your display.

		Figure 4-1. Exposure Sheet Screen

The menu bar at the top of the screen displays the Exposure Sheet column
headings:

	* Frame
	* Cel
	* Dial, Music, and Comments
	* Cel:1 (Current Cel)
	* Time: 00:00:01

The Frame column lists the number of frames used in the animation, and
depending on the selected frame rate, determines the time of the animation.

				4-2

The Cel column lets you assign the cel of the animation to a frame.  This
tells The Animation Studio when and how long to display a cel when running
the animation from the Exposure Sheet.  In traditional animation, this
column tells the camera man when and how long to film the specified cel. 
in both The Animation Studio and traditional animation, the cel column
lists the order of the cels.

The Dial, Music, and Comments column allows you to enter music and
instrument commands, or notes and comments to yourself about the content of
the frames and cels.  The Animation Studio accepts only music files saved
in the .smus format.  The control commands specific to The Animation Studio
are described later in this chapter, and a quick reference list of the
sound commands is provided in Appendix A - Sound Effects and Music.

The Time displayed on the right side of the menu bar shows the length of
the animation to the current cursor position on the Exposure Sheet.  This
number is continuously updated as you move the cursor.

Once you open and edit an Exposure Sheet, it is automatically stored with
the animation.  If you open the Exposure Sheet and do not make a change or
add anything to it, the Exposure Sheet will not be saved.

                        Exposure Sheet Menus

The Exposure Sheet menus are accessed through the menu bar.  Move the mouse
pointer to the top bar and hold the right mouse button down.  The following
menus display:

	* Project
	* Edit
	* Preview

				4-3

The Project menu is similar to the Pencil Test Project menu.  This menu
lets you perform the basic file and Exposure Sheet functions.  The Edit
menu lists the keyboard commands that correspond to the functions displayed
in boxes at the bottom of the screen.  The Preview menu provides the
requesters for accessing sound effects and music scores.

                             Project Menu

To display the Project menu items, move the mouse pointer to the menu bar,
hold the right mouse button down and move to the Project menu.  Some of the
menu items provide corresponding keyboard commands.

		Figure 4-2. Exposure Sheet Project Menu

				4-4

New

Select New to clear the current Exposure Sheet.  A requester displays
asking you to confirm this function.  Click on OK to clear the Exposure
Sheet.  Click on Cancel to return to the current Exposure Sheet.

	Keyboard Command: A n (hold down the right Amiga key on your
		          keyboard and press [n].)

Open

Select Open to load a pre-existing Exposure Sheet.  A requester displays
that allows you to move through the system to locate Exposure Sheet files. 
Previously saved Exposure Sheet files have the .expo file extension.

	Keyboard Command: A o

Append

Select Append to add another Exposure Sheet to the end of the current
Exposure Sheet.

Save

Select Save to save the current Exposure Sheet.  If the current Exposure
Sheet has not been saved previously, the requester asks if you want to save
the file as Untitled.  We recommend that you assign a file name to each
file and Exposure Sheet.  Since the Exposure Sheet is automatically saved
to the animation, you only need to use this command if you intend on using
the current Exposure Sheet as a template for other animations, or you want
to move the current Exposure Sheet and add it to another Exposure Sheet.

Keyboard Command: A w

				4-5

Save As

Similar to the Save As function in the Pencil Test, Save As allows you to
save the Exposure Sheet and assign a name to the Exposure Sheet file.  A
requester displays.  If you assign a file name already in use, another
requester asks if you want to overwrite the existing file with the current
file.  Be sure that you do not overwrite an Exposure Sheet that you want to
keep intact.  You only need to use this command if you intend on using the
current Exposure Sheet with another animation or another Exposure Sheet. 
Otherwise, the current Exposure Sheet is automatically attached to the
animation.

Save by Sheet

Select Save by Sheet to save the animation with the timing established in
the Exposure Sheet.  Save by Sheet saves the animation frame by frame and
preserves the Exposure Sheet information.  You can use Save by Sheet with
the IFF or Anim file formats.  This function is useful when creating an
black and white animation when you want to paint the animation in another
paint package, while maintaining the timing established in the Exposure
Sheet.

Print

Select Print to print the Exposure Sheet to your printer.

Animate

Select Animate to run the current series of cels in the Pencil Test
according to the information in the Exposure Sheet.  Press any mouse button
to stop the animation and return to the Exposure Sheet.

	Keyboard Command: A a

				4-6


About

Selecting About displays a window notifying you of the software version
number and copyright information.

	Keyboard Command: A ?

Pencil Test

Select Pencil Test to return to the Pencil Test Screen.

	                   Edit Menu

To display the Edit menu items, move the mouse pointer to the menu bar,
hold the right mouse button down and move to the Edit menu.  The menu items
displayed in the menu correspond to the commands displayed in boxes at the
bottom of the screen.

	 	     Figure 4-3.  Edit Menu

				4-7

Copy

Select Copy to copy a line or a group of lines to memory.  To select a
group of lines, see the Block command below.  Use this command with the
Paste command.

	Keyboard Command: A c

Cut

Select Cut to cut a line or group of lines from the Exposure Sheet.  To
select a group of lines, see the Block command below.  The deleted lines
are temporarily stored in computer memory, and can be reinstated into the
Exposure Sheet using the Paste command.  This is called a "safe delete"
since you can regain the information just cut.

	Keyboard Command: A x

Paste

Select Paste to insert the contents of the temporary memory into the
Exposure Sheet.  Information selected using the Copy or Cut command can be
pasted back in to the Exposure Sheet using the Paste command.  Remember
that only the most recent Copy or Cut can be pasted in the Exposure Sheet
since the temporary memory stores information from your most recent action.

	Keyboard Command: A i

Sparse

Select Sparse to add space in the Exposure Sheet in the form of blank
frames.  Use this technique to slow down parts of the animation.  All
frames that follow the inserted space(s) are moved ahead in the Frame
column.  If you highlight a block of cels using the Block command and then
select Sparse, every line in the

				4-8

selected block automatically has a blank frame following it.  You can
increase the number of blank frames to be inserted by clicking on the
number box at the bottom of the Cel column before selecting Sparse.

	Keyboard Command: A f

Search

Selecting Search displays a prompt at the bottom of the Exposure Sheet
requesting a search string.  This allows you to search the Exposure Sheet
for a word or string of characters.  Enter the string you wish to locate
and press [Return].  The computer will search down the Dial, Music, and
Comments column for the matching string.  The Search function searches down
from the current cursor position to the last frame in the Exposure Sheet. 
If you want to search the entire Exposure Sheet, make sure that you start
at the top of the Exposure Sheet.  If no match is found, the screen flashes
once.  Use the search technique to locate commands or comments in the
Comments column, especially when working on large animations.

	Keyboard Command: A s

Search Again

Select Search Again to search for the next occurrence of the string most
recently entered in the Search command.  If no match is found, the screen
flashes once.

	Keyboard Command: A g

Block

Select Block to highlight a number of lines in the Exposure Sheet.  This
command can be used to select more than one line of information for use
with the Copy, Cut, or Sparse commands.  To

				4-9

select a block of lines, you may click on the left mouse button and drag
the mouse pointer to encompass the area you want to block, or you can
select Block and move the cursor to a new location.  The lines in between
the first and last cursor positions are selected, and any of the Block
operations can now be selected.  The operation you select will affect the
selected block.

	Keyboard Command: A b

First/Last Frame

Select First/Last Frame to move the cursor to the beginning or end of the
Exposure Sheet.  If you are on frame 1 when you select First/Last Frame
from the Edit menu, you will move to the last frame of the Exposure Sheet. 
if you are on any other frame, selecting First/Last Frame places you on
frame 1.

	Keyboard Command: A t

                           Preview Menu

To display the Preview menu items, move the mouse pointer to the menu bar,
hold the right mouse button and move to the Preview menu.

				4-10

                      Figure 4-4. Preview Menu

Score

Select Score to display the Score requester.  The Score requester offers a
simple and effective way to preview scores created in music packages that
create .smus files.  The Animation Studio can only play music saved as a
.smus file.  To run a score, click once on the score you wish to play
(select from the middle box) and then click on the Load box located at the
bottom of the requester.  Click on Stop to stop the current score.  You
cannot modify scores from this requester.

Note: Before previewing a score, you must set the instrument directory.  To
do so, select instrument from the Preview Menu and enter a drawer name
which contains the .instr file.  Click on Cancel.  You may now preview the
score.

				4-11

                      Figure 4-5. Score Requester

Instrument

Select Instrument to display a requester similar to the Score requester. 
The digitized instruments and sounds available display in the middle box of
the requester and have an .instr extension.  Select instruments and sounds
by selecting the file from the requester, and clicking on Load.  Another
requester displays that allows you to control the pitch and volume of the
sound.  To play the sound, press [Shift].

				4-12

                    Figure 4-6. Instrument Requester

Flush Music

Select Flush Music to clear previously loaded sounds from memory.

				4-13

                      Exposure Sheet Help Key

The Exposure Sheet provides a Help Window.  The Help window displays
special keys not listed in the menus, function keys, and !Command syntax. 
Press [Help] to display the Help screen.

                        Figure 4-7.  Help Screen

Shift-Arrow Keys

Press Shift with any of the keyboard arrow keys to move around quickly in
the Exposure Sheet.

Go To Editor

Press [F6] to switch to the Pencil Test screen.

!Commands

The commands described below are used in the Dial, Music, and Comments
column of the Exposure Sheet.  There are two types of

				4-14

!Commands used in the Exposure Sheet: Sound and Control.  Sound commands
are used to modify and manipulate scores, notes, and sound effects. 
Control commands affect the execution of the Exposure Sheet.  The
exclamation point (!) precedes the command term.  Comments can also be
added to this column.  The semicolon precedes any comments added to the
Dial, Music and comments column.  Sound commands are described in Appendix
A.

Control Commands

	!Begin
	The !Begin command tells the Exposure Sheet where to begin
	animating.  It sets the starting frame of the animation.  This
	command is useful when used with the !End command to section off
	areas of the animation that you would like to isolate and run
	according to the Exposure Sheet information.  The !Begin command
	can also be used alone to indicate where to start to run the 
	animation.  Once the end of the Exposure Sheet is reached, the
	program loops and plays from the !Begin command.

	!End
	The !End command sets the ending frame of the animation and can be
	used in conjunction with the !Begin command to isolate areas of the
	animation to test and work on.  The !End command can be used alone
	anywhere in the Exposure Sheet to end the animation and loop back
	to the beginning.

	To enter the commands in the Exposure Sheet simply click the left
	mouse button in the Dial, Music, and Comments column.  A small
	highlighted box (the cursor) appears.  Use the keyboard to type
	the command you want to use.

				4-15

                   How To Use The Exposure Sheet

The Exposure Sheet operates according to your instructions: the order and
spacing of the frames and cels, for example, and the types and order of
sound effects that you want to incorporate.  It is a good idea to
experiment, and run your animation to test your work.  In order to achieve
effects similar to standard animations, it is important to remember that
standard animations are filmed at 24 frames per second, which means that 24
frames pass in front of the camera every second.  Most animations are
filmed in twos: each cel is shown twice.

When the Exposure Sheet is first opened, it is set up to help you run your
animation in twos: each time you press [Return] to add frames, the cels of
your animation are automatically added to every other frame.  The order
of the cels can be changed to suit your needs by editing the cel column on
the Exposure Sheet.

Click the mouse in the cel column and use the keyboard to add, delete, or
reorder the cels.  The number located in the small box at the bottom of the
Cel column displays the number of frames added to the Exposure Sheet each
time you press [Return] key.  Click on this box with the left mouse button
to change this number.  This number can range from 1 to 6.

                  Creating an Exposure Sheet:

	1. Move the mouse pointer to the Frame column.  Notice that the
	   Exposure Sheet has a 1 in the Frame column and a 1 in the Cel
	   column.  The 1 in the Cel column is highlighted.

				4-16

	2. Press [Return] to add frames to the Frame column.  If you open
	   the Exposure Sheet without creating any cels, or if you created
	   only one cel, each time you press [Return], frames are added,
	   and a cel is placed every few frames.  If you have created an
	   animation of two or more cels, pressing [Return] adds two frames
	   to the Frame column and places cel 2 at frame 3.  The number of
	   frames added is specified by the number in the box at the bottom
	   of the Cel column.  To change the value, click on the box. 
	   Values can range from 1 to 6.

Notice that the time of the animation displayed in the menu bar increases
as you add frames to the Exposure Sheet.  The amount of time depends on the
frame rate and the number of frames entered in the Exposure Sheet.

	3. To add or change the order of cels in the Cel column, click the
	   mouse button in the Cel column on the frame line that you want
	   to modify.

	   If a cel number already exists on that line, click the mouse on
	   the cel number until the number is highlighted.  Delete that
	   number using the Del key.  Type in the cel number that you want
	   to appear on that frame.

	   If you try to add a cel number to the cel column that does not
	   exist in your animation, a warning displays notifying you that
	   the cel does not exist in the pencil test animation.

				4-17

	4. Continue to create and modify the Exposure Sheet by using the
	   mouse and the Return key to add and correct information.  Use
	   the keyboard to add information, and use the backspace key to
	   delete information.

	   If you want to add !commands, simply click the mouse pointer in
	   the Dial, Music, and Comments column on the frame where you want
	   the sound or music to occur.  Type in the command, being sure to
	   follow the correct command format and syntax.  For more
	   information on adding sound and music, refer to Appendix A -
	   Sound Effects and Music.

	5. Once you have entered some information to the Exposure Sheet,
	   try running the animation to test your work.  Either select
	   Animate from the Project menu or the command box at the bottom
	   of the screen, or hold the right Amiga key (A) and press [a]. 
	   The animation will run according to the exposure sheet.  To stop
	   the animation and return to the Exposure Sheet, click on either
	   mouse button.

                      Adjusting the Frame Rate:

	1. Click on the small box at the bottom of the Frame column using
	   the left mouse button.

	2. The Frame Rate requester displays.

	3. Select one of the provided frame rates, or click on the custom
	   rate number and enter your own frame rate.

				4-18

	4. Select Exit & Animate to exit the Frame Rate requester and run
	   your animation at the new frame rate.  If you entered your own
	   frame rate, select Enforce Frame Rate and click on Exit &
	   Animate to be sure that the animation is run at the displayed
	   rate.

	5. Press either mouse button to stop the animation.

	6. The selected frame rate is displayed in the small box located at
	   the bottom of the Frame column.

				4-19

                              Chapter 5

                             Ink & Paint

The Ink & Paint section of The Animation Studio program lets you add color
to your animation.  Just as full animations go to the Ink & Paint
department once the pencil test, exposure sheets, and other important steps
are completed, so does your creation.  You have already created a pencil
test, working from ideas, through roughs, and finally testing your pencil
test - to the exposure sheet where you created the timing and specified the
sound effects.  This chapter explains the Ink & Paint features and options
available for you to add color and finishing touches to your animation.

                         Ink & Paint Elements

You can create your own palettes of up to 32 colors from a selection of
4,096 colors, or create even more colors using the dither feature.  Ink &
Paint is accessed through the Project menu of the Pencil Test, or can be
executed separately from the Workbench or CLI in a low memory system.  To
open Ink & Paint from the CLI, type Ink-&-Paint at the CLI prompt.

The Ink & Paint screen is similar to the Pencil Test screen.  The menu bar
at the top of the screen displays the current cel number.  The Toolbox is
located on the right side of the screen.

				5-1

The grid of colors under the Toolbox is the color palette, displaying the
current palette colors.  The Ink & Paint menus are accessed by moving your
mouse pointer to the menu bar and holding the right mouse button down to
display the menu titles.  The menu titles are:

	* Project
	* Edit
	* Camera
	* Tools
	* Preferences

You should be familiar with most of these menus from the Pencil Test and
Exposure Sheet sections of the program.  The Project menu lets you perform
basic Ink & Paint functions such as opening pencil test animations in Ink &
Paint, and saving your

				5-2

work.  The Edit menu provides options for editing the current Ink & Paint
animation.  The Camera menu lists options for a Frisket technique used when
loading files and adding backgrounds to your animation.  The Camera menu
and techniques are described at the end of this chapter.

The Tools menu lists some of the tools displayed in the Toolbox and their
corresponding keyboard commands.  The Preferences menu lets you turn the
Toolbox off and on, provides a filter option for output to video, and
allows you to set the number of colors used in your animation in order to
save money.

                            Project Menu

To display the Project menu, move the mouse pointer to the menu bar, hold
the right mouse button down.  Move the mouse pointer to the Project menu
title.  The menu items are displayed.

				5-3

                 Figure 5-2. Ink & Paint Project Menu

New

Select New to clear the current cels.  A requester displays asking if you
are sure that you want to clear the current cels.

	Keyboard command: N

Open

Select Open to load a pencil test animation or previously saved Ink & Paint
file into Ink & Paint.  This option is similar to the Pencil Test option. 
The Open menu has a submenu that lists the file formats you can open:

	* IFF
	* Anim
	* CFast

				5-4

	Once you select the file format, the Open requester displays:

                      Figure 5-3. Open Requester

This requester is similar to the Open requester described in the Pencil
Test Chapter.  Use Parent and Volume to move around on the disks to locate
other files you may want to open.  Select a file by clicking on the file
name displayed in the listing and then click on Load, or double click on
the file name.  The amount of space available on the disk displays at the
bottom of the requester.  Be sure to check the size of the file against the
amount of free memory available on your system before loading the file.

	Keyboard command: o

				5-5

Append

Select Append to add a file to the animation.  The submenu allows you to
specify the file format you wish to load.  The Append requester looks and
works like the Open requester.  The selected file is added to the end of
the current file open in Ink & Paint.  Use the Append option if you want to
build a large animation out of a number of smaller files.

	Keyboard command: none

Save

Select Save to save the entire color animation.  A file name should have
been assigned, either through the Save As command or Open procedure.  We
recommend that you assign a new file name to the color animation to keep
the pencil test file intact.  It is a good idea to save the file with a
.color extension, so you can recognize the file as a color animation.

	Keyboard Command: 5

Save As

Select Save As to assign a file name to the current animation and save it
to a disk.

				5-6

                    Figure 5-4. Save As Requester

Select Save As to open a requester similar to the Open requester.  Click on
Volume and select the name of the disk where you would like the file to be
saved from the requester window.  If you are attempting to save a file and
there is not enough room to save it, a message window displays notifying
you that the current disk is full.  Click on OK, and save the file to a
new, formatted disk.

	Keyboard command: w (for CFast)

	Secure
	Select Save As>>Secure to "lock" a completed animation to prevent
	tampering or modification to the file.  Secured files can be shown
	using the Flick or Flicker projector programs located on the
	STUDIO disk.  Flick and Flicker allow you to show an animation
	without having to enter The Animation Studio program.  Do not
	select Secure if you need to make changes to an animation.  After
	you select Save As>>Secure, a requester displays on screen where
	you must enter an artist's note about the secured file.  The 
	artist's note displays when you use Flick or Flicker to show the
	animation.

				5-7

Animate

Select Animate to view the current cels.  Selecting Animate in Ink & Paint
runs the cels in the current cel order, not by the order set in the
exposure sheet.

	Keyboard command: a

If you want to animate the current file according to the timing established
in the exposure sheet:

	1. Save the file and quit The Animation Studio.

	2. Exit The Animation Studio program so that you are on the
	   Workbench level.  Leave the STUDIO disk window open.

	3. Place the disk on which you have stored your animation into the
	   disk drive.  Double-click on the disk icon to reveal the icons
	   for your animation.

	4. Notice the two Projector icons in the STUDIO window.  The
	   Projector icon on the left is called Flicker, which runs your
	   animation with any sound effects or music used in the exposure
	   sheet.  The Projector icon on the right is called Flick, which
	   runs the animation without sound.

	5. Click once on the icon of the file you wish to animate.

	6. Hold [Shift] and double click on either the Flick or Flicker
	   icon.  The file loads and animates.

	7. Click one of the mouse buttons to stop the animation.

To run an animation using Flick or Flicker from the CLI, type either Flick
file name, or Flicker file name at the CLI prompt.  File name is the name
of the CFast file you want to animate.  Flick & Flicker are on the STUDIO
disk.

				5-8

Pencil Test

Select Pencil Test to return to the Pencil Test screen.  You may select
this option if you started Ink & Paint from the Pencil Test.

About

Selecting About displays a window containing the software version number,
and copyright information.

	Keyboard Command: ?

Quit

Select Quit to exit the Ink & Paint program.  Selecting Quit returns you to
the Pencil Test screen if you started Ink & Paint from the Pencil Test.

	Keyboard command: ESC

				5-9

                             Edit Menu

To display the Edit menu, move the mouse pointer to the menu bar, hold the
right mouse button down, and move the mouse pointer to the Edit menu title.
The menu options display.

                       Figure 5-5. Edit Menu

Undo

Select Undo to erase your last action.

	Keyboard command: u

Restore

Select Restore to return the cel to its original state.  Restore erases all
additions or changes made to a cel.

	Keyboard command: U

				5-10

Clear

Select Clear to clear the current screen and fill it with the background
color.  If the Frisket is set, the areas protected by the Frisket will not
be cleared.  In order to completely clear the current cel if the Frisket is
set, free the Frisket.

	Keyboard Command: K

Goto

Select Goto to move to a specified cel.  This is similar to the Goto
command in the Pencil Test Edit menu.  The Goto requester displays asking
you to enter the cel number you want to move to.

	Keyboard Command: g

Load Background

Select Load to load a single IFF picture.  A requester displays that allows
you to select the file name you want to load.  Once you select a file,
another requester displays, asking you to enter the specific cel numbers to
load the background behind.  Enter the cel number(s) and select OK to load
the picture.

If the Frisket is set, the selected picture loads under the Frisket colors.
If Auto Remap is on and you are mapping the foreground, the cels remap to
the colors set by the Palette.  Refer to the Camera section for more
information.

Save

Select Save from the Edit menu to save the current cel as a single IFF
file.  The Ink & Paint Save command is similar to the Pencil Test Save Cel
command.  If the file is too large to completely save on the current disk,
save the file on a blank, formatted disk and delete the remnants from the
original disk from the first attempted Save.

				5-11

Creating A Frisket

Before you can add a background to your painted animation cels, you must
mask the painted objects so that they are distinguished from the
background.  To do this, The Animation Studio provides a function called
Frisket.  Frisket is a term that describes a masking technique used by
artists to protect painted areas.

To create a frisket for your animation, pull down the Camera menu and
select the Frisket menu item.  The screen displays the Frisket requester as
shown below.

                     Figure 5-9. Frisket Requester

The Frisket requester lets you specify the colors that you are using in
your animation in order to keep those colors on top of the background.  To
specify the colors, point to them in the Frisket requester palette and
click the left mouse button, or point to them on the cel and click.  When
you have selected a color, a small pointer is displayed next to the color.

				5-12

Select all the colors that you are using for the sack animation cels. 
Don't forget to select black.  When you have selected the colors, click on
Use.  Note that the title bar at the top of the screen now displays
(Frisket) showing that a frisket is in use.  Turn on the Auto Remap option
and select Map To Foreground from the Camera menu.  These commands are
described in detail in the User Guide.

Loading a Background

The final step in adding a background to your animation is to load the
background file.  To do this, pull down the Edit menu and select the Load
menu item.  The screen displays the Load Cel requester as shown below. 
Select the Sack-Background file from the STUDIO disk Library drawer and
click on Load.

                  Figure 5-10. Load Cel Requester

				5-13

Click on the enclosed area using the left mouse button to fill with the
foreground color, or the right mouse button to fill with the background
color.

	Keyboard Command: f

                Figure 5-7. Example of Fill on Color

Dither Fill

Select the Dither Fill to fill a selected area of the animation with the
dithered colors.  Dithered colors are colors created from two other
selected colors using the dither box located below the Magnify and Zoom
tools.

To create a dithered color:

	1. Click the left mouse button on the left side of the Dither Box.
	   Notice that the mouse pointer changes to a cross hair and says
	   Pick vertically below it.

				5-14

	2. Choose a color from the palette.  That color displays on the
	   left side of the Dither Box.

	3. Click the left mouse button on the right side of the Dither
	   Box and choose the second color from the palette.  Notice that
	   the middle of the Dither Box now displays the new color 
	   created from the two colors you selected from the palette.

Use this technique to add texture to the image.

Once you have created the dither pattern you want, move the mouse pointer
to the cel area and click on the area you want to fill.

	Keyboard Command: F

Fill To Color

Select the Fill to Color tool (the bucket icon that isn't pouring) to
select a color from the screen or Toolbox palette, and fill an enclosed
area until it reaches the boundaries of the selected color.  Let's say that
you have a yellow outline circle and an overlapping blue outline circle on
the screen.  Select the Fill to Color tool and blue from the palette or
screen.  Click in the blue outline circle.  The blue circle fills
completely with your foreground color, even though the yellow circle and
blue circle intersect.

Click on the enclosed area with the left mouse button to fill with the
foreground color, or the right mouse button to fill with the background
color.

				5-15

                 Figure 5-8. Example of Fill to Color

CLR

This is the same as selecting Clear from the Edit menu.  The current cel is
erased, and filled with the background color.

	Keyboard command: K

Undo

Select Undo to erase your last action.

	Keyboard command: u

Magnify

Select Magnify to enlarge a selected area of the screen.  Use the mouse to
pixel edit the image where needed.  This functions like the Magnify tool in
Pencil Test.  Click on the Magnify tool again to return the screen to its
unmagnified state.

	Keyboard command: m

				5-16

Zoom

Select Zoom while an area of the image is magnified.  Clicking on the top
half of the Zoom icon zooms in on the image in the magnify window and
clicking on the bottom half of the Zoom tool allows you to zoom out from
the image.

Dither Box

The Dither Box displays the currently created dither color.  Dithering is a
technique that alternates the values of pixels using two colors.  The
dither pattern in the middle of the box looks like a checkerboard.  The
Dither Box has a right and left side.  Each side displays the color
selected from the palette, and the middle displays the resultant dither
pattern.  For instructions on creating dithered colors, refer to the Dither
Fill tool section of this chapter.  Better dithered results are obtained
when you use two colors that are similar, as opposed to two colors that are
completely different.  If you choose to use two colors that are very
different, the resultant dither pattern has a checkerboard look.

Color Palette

The Color Palette is the collection of small multicolored boxes located
below the tools and above the Left and Right arrows.  The colors displayed
comprise the selected palette.  Select a color by clicking the mouse button
on it.  This color appears in the center of the current colors box below
the Dither Box.  This is the foreground color.  To select a background
color:

	1. Select that color as the foreground color.

	2. Click in the outer area of the current colors box.

	3. The foreground color spreads throughout the current colors box.

	4. Select a new foreground color.

				5-17

The colors can be changed or modified, and new palettes can be created
through the Color requester.  Each palette can have up to 32 colors.  The
Animation Studio allows a separate color palette for each cell.  The Color
requester is accessed through the Camera menu.  To open the Color
requester, move the mouse to the Camera menu, and display the menu items. 
Move the mouse pointer to Palette and release the mouse button.

	Keyboard Command: p

                   Figure 5-9. Color Requester

	Creating or Modifying Colors
	Colors can be changed and modified using the R, G, B, and the H,
	S, and V sliders (the vertical bars in the middle and on the left
	side of the color requester).  Each slider has 16 possible
	settings.

				5-18

	Click on the color box you want to change.  Click the arrows 
	located at the top and bottom of the R (red), G (green), and B
	(blue) sliders to change the color of the selected box, or click
	the mouse button inside the vertical bar on the slider, and drag
	the slider up and down to change the color quickly.

	The H (hue), S (saturation), and V (value) slider bars may also be
	used to change and modify colors.  Use the H slider to cycle 
	through the color wheel.  Modifying the S slider adds or subtracts
	the amount of white in the selected color.  Modifying the V slider
	adds or subtracts the amount of black in a selected color.

	Notice that when you create colors using the RGB sliders the HSV
	sliders respond to that change.  The same is true when you use the
	HSV sliders.

	Moving Colors in the Palette
	The Copy and Excng boxes let you move colors in the palette.  To
	copy a color to another location on the palette, select the color
	you want to copy by clicking on it.  Then click on Copy and click
	on the second color.  The first color is copied to the location
	of the second color.

	Select Excng to exchange the position of two colors on the palette.
	Click on the first color, click on Excng, and then click on the
	second color.  The two colors swap places on the palette.

	Note that the colors in the cel are based on their position in the
	palette, so that if you swap two colors on the palette, the colors
	will be swapped on your image as well.

	Creating Color Spreads
	The Spread function allows you to select two colors on the palette
	and create a spread of colors in between the selected colors.  To
	create a spread, click on the first color, click on

				5-19

	Spread, and then click on the second color.  Depending on the space
	between the two colors, Spread creates a number of color gradations
	from the first to the second color.

	Creating Ranges
	Select Range to create up to six different ranges of colors. Ranges
	can be used to create an effect called color cycling, which is an
	advanced technique described later in this chapter.

	      Figure 5-10. Color Requester with Ranges Displayed

	Select Range from the Color requester opens a window below the
	requester.

	Clicking on Range again closes the Range window.  This window
	displays the six possible ranges you can create.  The default set
	of colors is displayed in each of the six ranges.  You can modify
	a range using color requester techniques such as Copy, Spread,
	Exchange, and the slider bars.  To select a range:

				5-20

	1. Click the mouse on a color in the range.  The range number
	   highlights.

	2. Modify the range as desired.

	3. Use the arrows to the left and right of the colors to change
	   the size of the range.  Click on one of the arrows and hold
	   the mouse button down while sliding the arrow in or out.
	   Notice that when you slide the arrow back out again, the colors
	   that disappeared when you changed the length of the range
	   reappear.

	4. The speed slider, located at the bottom of the Color requester,
	   lets you control the speed of the color cycling for each range.
	   Move the mouse pointer to the speed slider and drag the slider
	   to the right to cycle the colors faster, or to the left to cycle
	   slower.

	5. The arrows to the right and left of the speed slider also adjust
	   the speed.  Click on the arrow using the left mouse button.
	   Hold the mouse button down on the slider to display the cycle
	   speed on your monitor.

	6. The small box to the far right of the speed slider sets the
	   direction of the cycle for the current range.  Click on the box
	   using the left mouse button.

	7. The box originally displays a dash which means the cycling
	   capability for that range is off.  Click on the box.  The arrow
	   which faces right cycles the colors from left to right.

	8. Click the box again.  The arrow that faces left cycles the
	   colors from right to left.

				5-21

Undo

Select Undo to undo your last action.

Remap

Select Remap to redraw the frame from the current palette.  Any colors used
in the cel will be adjusted to the current palette.  Remap finds the best
match on the current palette for the colors used in the original cel.

Cancel

Select Cancel to close the color requester and return the palette to its
original state.  Any changes made to the palette since it was opened are
ignored.

OK

Click on the OK to save all changes made to the color requester, and close
the requester window.

				5-22

                           Preferences Menu

To display the Preferences menu, move the mouse pointer to the menu bar and
hold the right mouse button down.  Move the mouse pointer to the
Preferences menu title.  The menu options display.

		     Figure 5-11. Preference Menu

Set # of Colors

Select Set # of Colors to set the maximum number of colors used in the
animation.  This menu option allows you to set the number of colors used to
2, 4, 8, 16, or 32.  Once you select the number, you cannot create more
colors than the number specified.  Lowering the number of colors helps save
memory, which is a valuable tool when creating longer color animations.

				5-23

NTSC Filter

Select the NTSC Filter when you are ready to output your animation to
video.  The NTSC equipment (National Television Standards Committee) can
only handle a fraction of the colors offered on the Amiga.  The Amiga can
produce up to 4,096 colors, whereas NTSC can handle only 2000.  The Amiga
displays up to 16 shades of red, green, and blue, while NTSC can only show
12.  Colors outside the range of NTSC capabilities will display differently
in NTSC on the video monitor, and vibrate and bleed in an unattractive
manner.

	Select In Use from the submenu to alternately enable and disable
	the filter.

	Select Set to display the NTSC requester.  This allows you to set
	the range of colors to the filter.  The default setting is 1-12. 
	If you have better video equipment that can handle more colors,
	adjust the range in the requester to match the capabilities of your
	video equipment.

Toolbox

Select Toolbox to turn the Toolbox display off and on.  Press F10 on your
keyboard to toggle the menu bar and Toolbox off and on.  Pressing F9
toggles just the menu bar.

				5-24

                  How to Ink & Paint Your Animation

To add color to a Pencil Test animation using fills:

	1. Select Open from the Project menu.

	2. Select the pencil test file you want to paint by clicking on
	   the file name.  Click Load at the bottom of the Open requester
	   to open the file in Ink & Paint.

	3. Be sure that the objects or characters that you want to fill
	   are "closed".  Check to see that the lines and shapes that form
	   each area have ends that meet.  To check this, use the Magnify
	   and Zoom tools in the Toolbox.  Use the pixel edit technique
	   described in the Pencil Test chapter or use the Freehand Line
	   tool to modify the image.

	4. Select a color from the palette by clicking on it with the left
	   mouse button.

	5. Select the type of fill by clicking on the tool in the Toolbox.

	6. Move the mouse pointer to the image on screen and click on the
	   area or object that you want to fill.

Each cel of the animation has to be colored separately.  Use the Left and
Right Arrow keys on the screen or keyboard to move through the sequence of
cels.  Also, color can be added to your animation using the drawing tools
in the Toolbox.  Each cel also has its own palette.  If you would like to
use the same palette throughout the animation, select Copy to All from the
Camera menu.

				5-25

If you decide to change a color used in your animation, go to the color
requester and modify the color.  The color on screen used in the animation
responds to your changes immediately, allowing you to instantly see the
results of the color change.  Experiment and have fun.

                        Ink & Paint Help Key

The Help key on the Amiga keyboard displays the Ink & Paint help window. 
Similar to the Pencil Test Help window, the Ink & Paint Help window
displays the operation of the arrow and function keys.

		     Figure 5-12.  Help Screen

				5-26

                            Color Cycling

Color cycling is an effect that creates the illusion of movement or change
by rapidly changing the colors of a still image.  For example, if you
wanted to create a lightning effect on your animation, you would draw the
bolt of lightning using a series of lines, so that the bolt consists of
about five lines.  Create a range using five colors for the lightning bolt
making sure that one of the colors used in the range is the color used to
draw the bolt.  Turn that range on, set the direction and speed of the
cycle, and press [Tab] to test the color cycle.  The bolt appears to move
due to the color cycling.

Use the color ranges in the color requester to create the different cycles.

	1. Load your pencil test animation if you haven't already done so.
	   To do this from Ink & Paint, select Open from the Project menu.
	   Select the file type from the submenu, and then select the file
	   from the requester.  Click on Load.

	2. Color the animation.

	3. Open the Color requester (if you haven't already done so) by
  	   selecting Palette from the Camera menu.

	4. Select Range to display the range window at the bottom of the
	   color requester.

	5. Select and create the range that contains the colors you want
	   to use.

	   Note: Color cycling is a function of the palette for each cel.
	   To make color cycling useful in an animation, try to use the
	   same palette in a sequence of cels.

				5-27

	6. Set the length of the range to include only those colors that
	   you want to cycle.  Slide the arrows on either side of the
	   colors to size the range.

	7. Select the direction of the cycle by clicking on the direction
	   arrow in the Color requester.

	8. Set the cycle speed using the speed slider in the color 
	   requester.  Move the slider to the left to cycle slower and to
	   the right to cycle faster.

	9. Once the range and cycle are established, click on OK.  The 
	   Color requester closes and saves the changes made to the
	   requester.

       10. Select Animate from the Ink & Paint Project menu or hold the
 	   right Amiga key and press [a] to animate the color cycling.

Once the animation is painted and you are ready to include a background,
you can use the Camera functions to complete your animation on the Amiga.

				5-28

                             Camera Menu

The Camera menu provides a number of powerful tools to assist you in the
completion of your animation.  The Frisket technique allows you to bring in
backgrounds from other Amiga paint applications or other Animation Studio
files and place the color version of your animation on top of the painted
background.  The term "frisket" is an art term that describes the masking
technique used on artwork to prevent areas covered by the frisket from
getting damaged by paint.

			Figure 5-13. Camera Menu

				5-29

Frisket

Select Frisket to display the Frisket requester.  The Frisket requester
allows you to select the colors which will form the mask or frisket.

			Figure 5-14.  Frisket Requester

The Frisket requester has the current palette displayed in the center of
the requester, and four function boxes at the bottom of the window: Clear,
Use, Invert and Cancel.  The white boxes at the top of each vertical column
of colors allow instant selection of all the colors in that column that are
not already selected, and automatically deselects the colors currently
chosen.

To select a color, use the left mouse button and click on the desired color
in the requester or in the cel.  A black box to the right of the color marks
the selected color.  If the last two colors

				5-30

at the bottom of the first column are selected, and you click on the white
box at the top of that column, the first six colors are now selected, and
the last two colors are not.  You may select as many colors as you need to
create a frisket for your animation.

Once the frisket is selected and turned on, backgrounds with multiple
colors can be loaded.  The background will automatically display behind
animation cels if the frisket is set up correctly.  If the frisket is not
set up correctly, parts of the background may show through the animation.

	Keyboard Command: ~

Clear

Select Clear from the bottom of the Frisket requester to deselect all
colors.

Use

Select Use to confirm the current frisket setup, and turn the frisket
function on.  The Frisket requester closes and the word Frisket displays in
parentheses in the menu bar.

Invert

Select Invert to reverse the current frisket.  All colors that were not
selected are selected when you click on Invert, and colors that were
selected are deselected.  This option is useful if you need to select many
colors from the palette.  In this case, it is faster to select the colors
that are not used, and then select Invert.

Cancel

Select Cancel to clear all modifications made to the Frisket requester
since it was opened.  The Frisket requester closes and ignores any changes
made.

				5-31

In Use

Select In Use from the Camera menu to toggle the frisket option off and on.

	Keyboard Command:

Free

Select Free to clear the memory required to store the frisket.  When the
frisket is not in use, it is a good idea to select Free to make more memory
available for other operations.

Palette

Select Palette from the Camera menu to display the Ink & Paint Color
requester.  The Color requester is made up of the following parts: color
sliders, commands, color palette, and ranges.

			Figure 5-15. Color Requester

				5-32

When the requester displays, only the first three are shown.  Ranges are
displayed by clicking on the Range box.  The range window at the bottom of
the requester displays.  Refer to the Color Palette section of this chapter
for more information on ranges and detailed descriptions of the palette and
Color requester.

	Keyboard Command: p

	Undo
	This undoes your last action.

	Remap
	Select Remap to remap the colors used in the cel image to the
	colors used in your modified palette.

	Frame
	This is the number of the palette being used on the current cel.
	This allows you to select the number of a palette used on another
	cel without having to advance to that cel.  This is useful if you
	would like to match certain colors from one cel to colors used on
	another cel.

	Cancel
	Select Cancel to erase all modifications made to the current
	Palette.

	Cycle Direction
	The small box located at the bottom of the Color requester to the
	right of the speed slider contains a dash, a left arrow, or right
	arrow, which determines the direction of the color cycle.  Move
	the mouse pointer to this box and click the left mouse button to
	change the symbol in the box.  The left arrow cycles the colors in
	the range from right to left, the right arrow cycles from left to
	right, and the dash disables the color cycling feature.

				5-33

OK

Select OK to confirm all changes to the palette, and close the requester
window.  This returns you to the Ink & Paint screen.

Speed Slider

This is like a small slide rule that allows you to set the speed of the
color cycling.  The Speed Slider is located at the bottom of the Color
requester.  Move the mouse pointer to the Speed Slider.  Drag the slider to
the right to cycle the range colors faster, or to the left to cycle slower.
You can also adjust the speed by clicking on the arrows to the left and
right of the Speed Slider.  Hold the left mouse button down on the slider
to display the cycle speed on your monitor.

Refer to the Color Palette section of this chapter for more information on
ranges, the color palette, and Color requester.

Default

Select Default to reset the color palette to the default palette.

Copy to All

This copies the current palette to all the palettes used in the animation,
including the Range palettes.  Remember, each cel can have its own palette.
Selecting this option sets all cels to the current palette.

Copy Forward

Select Copy Forward to copy the palette used on the current cel to all of
the following cels in the animation.

Copy Reverse

Select Copy Reverse to copy the palette used on the current cel to all of
the previous cels in the animation.

Auto Remap

Select Auto Remap to automatically remap colors in your animations and
backgrounds.  Your animation can use a different color

				5-34

palette than the one used in the background you wish to load.  If you
simply load a background, your animation will be re-colored using the
palette from the background.  To avoid this problem, either:

	* Make sure the same palette is used in your animation and your
	  background.

	* Activate Auto Remap, and set the map option to Map to Foreground.

Map To

Select Map To to establish the direction of the remap.

	Foreground
	Select Foreground to force the colors used in the background to be
	converted to the colors used in the animation.

	Background
	Select Background to force the colors of the animation to be 
	converted to the colors used in the background.

				5-35

                              Chapter 6

                        Putting It All Together

Now that you are familiar with the different types of animation and the
capabilities of The Animation Studio, it's time to put all the techniques
and information together and create your own animation from start to
finish.  This chapter helps you tie together the actual techniques used in
animation with the tools of The Animation Studio and your imagination.  The
rest is up to you.  Be creative, and don't be afraid to try new ideas or
techniques.  You may be pleasantly surprised at your results.

                            Generate Ideas

The first step is to come up with a story idea.  As mentioned in Chapter 1
- The Disney History of Animation: From Pencil to Pixel, story ideas can
come from books, fairy tales, or from your own inspiration.  Once you have
an idea for a story, you can begin to think of the type of character or
characters involved.  Do you want to draw something that looks like a
person, animal, creature, or an object?  Begin to sketch out your ideas on
paper.  Most artists begin with small sketches called thumbnails, which are
about 1 inch tall by 1 inch wide.

				6-1

                         Creating A Rough

Once you have an idea for a character, create a rough drawing of the
character on paper.  As mentioned earlier in this manual, a rough drawing
is a loose, freehand pencil sketch that helps you decide what the character
looks like.

	            Figure 6-1. Rough Sketch

A rough sketch is not a perfect drawing of the character - it allows you to
work out the details of its shape and appearance.  When you feel like you
have created a good rough of your character, go back over the drawing with
slightly darker lines to create the final sketch.  Clean up the drawing by
erasing lines or by darkening the outlines that are needed to create the
character.  Once you got accustomed to using the mouse to draw, thumbnails
and roughs can be created in the pencil test program.

				6-2

                             Pencil Test

You are ready to draw the character in the Pencil Test section.  Open The
Animation Studio by double clicking on the Animation Studio icon, or by
typing Pencil-Test at the CLI prompt.  Use the mouse and drawing tools
provided in the Toolbox on the right side of the screen to draw your
character.

Don't be afraid to make a mistake.  Use the Undo to fix mistakes, the CLR
tool to erase a cel, or use the New option to start the animation over
again.  One of the many features of The Animation Studio is the ability to
erase part or all of a drawing, or clear the cels to start the animation
over again.  As described in the Pencil Test chapter, you can select the
bottom half of the Rectangle tool, and by using the right mouse button,
draw an "invisible" white box that can be used as an eraser.  (The white
box seems to be invisible when used on a white background.)  Another way to
erase part of a drawing is to select part of the drawing as a brush. 
Again, holding the right mouse button so the selected image is white, drag
the brush on the screen as if it were an eraser.  For more information on
erasing and brush techniques, refer to the Pencil Test chapter.

Before animating your character, you may want to give more detailed thought
to the action, background, and staging of your animation.  Begin with
thumbnails and roughs.  Sketch your character with the background and
objects involved.

				6-3

            Figure 6-2.  Character with Background Sketch

You may want to create your own storyboard for your animation to help you
see the story on paper.  This will help you keep track of the action and
objects in the background, and visualize the steps necessary to create an
interesting and professional-looking animation.

Backgrounds can be created in the Ink & Paint section of The Animation
Studio, or you may want to create them in another paint package and add the
background to your animation in the Ink & Paint section.  It is important
to keep in mind the layout when you begin to animate your character.  For
more information on creating and adding backgrounds, refer to the Camera
Section of the Ink & Paint chapter.

				6-4

                      Animating Your Character

The process of creating smooth, fluid animations involves the creation of
beginning, ending, and in-between poses.  It is the in-between poses that
create flowing, believable movement.  When animating your character, don't
be afraid to create a number of cels, if that is what the animation needs
to make the movement look smooth.  It's not uncommon to have a short
animation that is made up of 20 to 40 cels.

Types of Movement

There are two basic animation styles: Limited animation and Full animation.
The difference between the two is the treatment of movement.  In Limited
animation, only certain parts of a character may move during a sequence. 
Perhaps only the character's mouth moves during a talking sequence, or just
the arms and legs move during a walking sequence, while the body and the
head of the character are copied and repeated.  You have probably seen this
type of animation on some of the Saturday morning cartoons.

If this is the type of animation you would like to try, the following Mouth
Chart, which shows different mouth expressions, should help you get ideas
and inspiration for your own animation.

				6-5

		       Figure 6-3. Mouth Chart

				6-6

Full, or Disney-style animation is well known for its fluid, life-like
movement.  This type of animation studies real movements and principles
found in nature.  Disney animators study actors, actresses, animals, and
objects to create believable and beautiful animations.  This technique
involves first creating the beginning and an ending pose, or what is
referred to as the two extremes of an action.  The action may require only
one drawing in between the two extremes, or it may require seven or more. 
The best method is th create the middle drawing next.

			Figure 6-4. Extremes

In-between poses are then added in between the beginning and middle
extremes, and the middle and ending extremes.  In-betweens continue to
break the action down into a series of drawings that carry the action of a
character through smoothly.

				6-7

	Figure 6-5. Beginning, Ending and In-between Drawings

The same technique can be used in The Animation Studio.  At first, you may
want to sketch out the different poses on paper.  Once you feel more
comfortable with this animation technique, you can use The Animation Studio
to create every step of the pencil test animation process.  There are two
ways to create your animation in The Animation Studio.  You can either:

	* produce the sequence cel by cel

	* use the Swap or j screen technique

To produce your animation cel by cel:

	1. Create the beginning extreme on cel 1.  You may want to start
	   with the character drawing you just created on paper.

				6-8

	2. Create the next cel by pressing the right arrow on your
	   keyboard, or by clicking on the Right Arrow in the Toolbox.

	3. Notice the onion skin effect when you advance cels.  You can
	   redraw the character using tools from the Toolbox, or you can
	   move back to the previous cel, copy the drawing as a brush, and
	   paste it on the next cel.  For more information on using 
	   brushes, refer to the Pencil Test chapter.

	4. Continue to add cels, copying, pasting, erasing, and modifying
	   as needed to create movement.

To create animation using the Swap or j screen technique:

	1. Create the beginning extreme on cel 1.

	2. Create the ending extreme on cel 2.

	3. Advance to cel 3.  Notice that you can see both the beginning
	   and ending extreme at the same time, which allows you to
	   correctly place the middle or "intermediate" drawing.

	4. Create the intermediate drawing on cel 3.

	5. Press [j] on your keyboard.  This swaps the image on the current
	   screen with the swap screen.  The swap screen, also referred to
	   as the j screen, can be used like a scratch pad.  You can create
	   the drawing you need without affecting the existing animation,
	   and insert the scratch pad material where you need it.

	6. Using the arrow key or arrow tool, move back to cel 2.  Press
	   [j].  The middle drawing created on cel 3 is now on cel 2.  The
	   drawing that was on cel 2 is now on the j screen.

	7. Move to cel 3 and press [j] again.  The drawing that was on cel

				6-9

	   2 originally is now on cel 3.  The series is now in the correct
	   order.

If you just need to copy the current cel onto the next cel, simply press
the Return key.  Continue to use the Swap screen as a scratch pad to swap
drawings and create the in-between drawings needed.  For more information
on the Swap screen, refer to the Pencil Test chapter.

You should frequently test your animation by selecting the Projector tool
from the Toolbox, or by pressing the [a] key.  By doing so, you can readily
see the movement of the character and decide if you need to add or
rearrange cels, or adjust the drawing.  Using the Projector tool to test
your animation does not damage or affect your drawing.

                     Basic Animation Techniques

Disney-style animation follows basic techniques and methods found in the
animation industry and in nature.  This section describes and gives
examples of those basic techniques for you to use in creating interesting
and professional-looking animations.  The Animation Studio provides
animated examples of some of the techniques described below.  There are two
different types of animated examples provided: Reference animations and
Example animations.  The Reference animations are actual Disney animations
of some familiar characters.  Reference animations are located on the
MORGUE disk.  Since these Disney characters are copy protected by law,
these computer files cannot be altered.  The Animation Studio provides the
Reference animations as instructional and inspirational examples.

The Example animations are provided for you to study as well as use in your
animation, and are located on the STUDIO disk in the Library drawer.

				6-10

To access the Reference animations, perform the following steps.  Remember
that modifications made to the Reference animations cannot be saved.

	1. Open Pencil Test.

	2. Select Open>>CFast from the Project menu.

	3. The Load requester displays.  Insert the Morgue disk into the
	   disk drive.

	4. If a window displays asking you to reinsert the Studio disk,
	   click on Cancel.  Another window displays notifying you that
	   a directory could not be found.  Click on Cancel.

	5. Click on Volume and double click on Morgue.

	6. The MORGUE disk volume lists in the center of the Load 
	   requester.  The Reference animation file names display.

	7. Double-click on the file name you would like to open.

	8. Press [a] or select Animate from the Project menu to run the
	   animation.  Many of the Reference animations can be run by their
	   exposure sheets.  To do this, press [Shift] [a] to animate.
	   Press either mouse button to stop the animation.

	9. Use the Right and Left Arrow keys to step through the animation.

Note: If your Amiga has only 512K of RAM, you don't have enough memory to
use the above technique for all the Reference animation.  You can still
view these animation by typing "FLICK filename" from the CLI.

				6-11

To access the Example animation:

	1. Open Pencil Test.

	2. Select Open>>CFast from the Project menu.

	3. The Load requester displays.  Click once on Volume.

	4. Click twice on Studio, which is listed in the center of the
	   requester.

	5. Click twice on Library.  The file names scroll in the center
	   window.

	6. Double-click on the file name you would like to animate.  The
	   file opens on screen.

	7. Press [a] or select Animate from the Project menu to run the
	   animation.

	8. Press either mouse button to stop the animation.

After you run an animation, it is a good idea to use the arrow keys or
icons to single-step through the animation so that you can see each cel of
the animation.  This is an excellent way to study each of the techniques so
that you can use similar techniques in your own creations.

The file names that illustrate the animation techniques are listed after
the description of each technique.

In-betweening

As mentioned earlier, in-betweening is the process of creating the drawings
between extremes.  These drawings carry the action of a character through
smoothly.  A smooth animation may require only one, or as many as seven or
more in-betweens.  The best method for creating the in-betweens is to
create the middle drawing first, and continue to split the action in half.

				6-12

Silhouette Test

There is a long standing rule in animation that states a good extreme pose
should "read" in silhouette.  This means that you should be able to "black
in" the pose and still be able to clearly see the action of the character.

The reason for this rule is that on the motion picture screen, you do not
have an opportunity to study the pose as you do in many other types of
artwork.  The impression of each key pose must, therefore, be as clear and
unmistakable as possible.

For example, in illustration A, it is fairly clear that Jiminy Cricket is
eating an ice cream cone, even though the pose is blackened in; whereas in
illustration B, Jiminy's action is not clear.  Try blackening in your
character's extreme pose and see if other people can tell what the
character is doing.

				6-13

		Figure 6-6. Silhouette Text Example

Squash and Stretch

Squash and stretch is contracting and expanding movement within a shape as
it moves through an action.  The squashing and stretching shows elasticity
and volume, and without it, characters would seem stiff and mechanical. 
Usually these shape changes are exaggerated by the animator, but it is a
good practice to maintain the volume of the character throughout the
movements.

There are two animated examples of Squash and Stretch provided on The
Animation Studio disks.  The file titled Tweedle-Brothers on the MORGUE
disk is the Disney animation example.  Remember, you can view but not
modify the animation.  Notice how the volume of Tweedle-dee and Tweedle-dum
remains the same throughout the series of movements.  Notice how the facial
ex-

				6-14

pressions, mouth movements, and exaggerated squashing and stretching add
humor to this animation.

The file titled Squash-Stretch on the STUDIO disk in the Library drawer is
the Example animation example, which you may copy, change, and paste into
your animation.  If you would like to copy part or all of the animation,
open this file in the Pencil Test program.

Notice how the ball changes shape as it approaches the bottom of the
screen, and how it flattens as it hits the "ground".  These techniques make
the bouncing ball seem natural.

Arcs

Arcs are the plotting of the highly circular path followed by most living
creatures' movements.  In an animation, they create pleasing designs in a
two dimensional path of action, and give fluidity to the movements.  Arcs
usually refer to the action of an arm or hand.

	Reference animation: Fairy-Godmother
	Example animation: Arc-of-Motion

Notice the Fairy Godmother's flowing sleeves and the arc of the wand and
her arm as she moves to the right.

Path of Action

Path of Action refers to the movement of a character through a staged
background.

	Reference animation: Goofy
	Example animation: Path-of-Action

The angle used in the Goofy animation adds to the action and appeal of this
animation.  Goofy starts out very small on the screen and increases in size
as he approaches the ski ramp.

				6-15

Anticipation

Anticipation refers to the specific movement preceding a major action which
leads the eye through the sequence of motions clearly.  It is the idea
that, "before you go one way, you must go the other way first."  This
principle is evident in almost every action.

	Reference animation: Donald
	Example animation: Anticipation

Donald sees something that makes him angry, and before he can jump up from
the table, he moves down toward the table, almost as if he is trying to
gain momentum for the giant, angry leap he is about to make.  Single-step
through the sequence of cels to study the squashing and stretching of
Donald's face as he reacts in surprise and anger.

                   Advanced Animation Techniques

Once you have accomplished some of the basics of animation, you may feel
bold enough to try more advanced animation techniques.  The techniques
presented in this section require a solid understanding of movement, the
creation of in-betweens, and some patience.  This section provides computer
animation examples for you to watch and study.

There are two animations provided to illustrate each technique.  The first
file name listed is the Disney Reference animation, which is copy
protected.  The second file name listed is the Example version of the
technique that you may use in your own animations. Again, the Reference
animations are on the MORGUE disk, and the Example animations are on the
STUDIO disk under the Library directory.

				6-16

Biped Walk

	Reference animation: Mickey
	Example animation: Two-legged-Walk

Notice how Mickey's head moves back and forth as he walks along, and how
the feather in his cap responds to that movement.  His hands and clothes
also move, which adds to the believability of this character in motion.

Quadruped Walk

	Reference animation: Pluto
	Example animation: Four-legged-Walk

Pluto's ears flop and his tail subtly wags as he walks.  Notice how Pluto
practically stays in the same place on screen yet he appears to be pushing
an invisible background with his paws.  This animation would work well with
a background that changes as he walks, which would enhance the illusion of
walking.

Biped Run

	Reference animation: Alice
	Example animation: Two-legged-Run

As Alice runs, watch the flow of her dress and apron, and the movement of
her arms.  These effects help make her run look natural and believable.

Quadruped Run

	Reference animation: Lady
	Example Animation: Four-legged-Run

The changing size of the animation on screen makes you feel as if

				6-17

Lady is really running toward you.

Flying

	Example animation: Flight

The bird's head and tail movements compliment the flapping wings and make
the flight appear natural.  Notice how the bird essentially stays in the
same place but appears to be flying and moving across the screen.

                              Try It

Now that you have the opportunity to see and experiment with different
animation techniques, and create your own character and animation, you can
move on to adding sound effects and backgrounds to your creation.  Refer to
the Exposure Sheet chapter and Appendix A for Exposure Sheet commands and
examples.

				6-18

                             Appendix A

                      Sound Effects and Music

The commands used to incorporate sounds and music are called Sound
commands, and are input to the Dialogue, Music, and Comments column of the
Exposure Sheet.  Any Amiga music or sound effects software package can be
used if the files used in The Animation Studio have been saved in the .smus
file format.  For more information on creating and saving music files,
refer to the respective software documentation.

The Animation Studio provides a directory called SoundFX on the STUDIO disk
that contains basic sound effects for you to use in your animation.

The Sound commands (!commands) are direct commands to The Animation Studio
that specify an action.  The commands are used to modify and manipulate
scores, notes and sound effects.  The Control commands used in the Exposure
Sheet are described in the Exposure Sheet chapter.

				A-1

Sound Commands

Each of the !commands has its own syntax and parameters that must be
followed in order for the command to be executed properly.  It is important
to recognize the following conventions:

	* The terms in <> brackets are parameters that must be included
	  in the command format.

	* Terms in [] brackets highlight optional information that may
	  be used in the command.

	* Words in "" are file names you need to input.

	* Words that appear in upper case are command terms that are input
	  as they appear.

	* Where parameters are separated by vertical bars (|), choose one
	  term from the list.

	* The command term parameters appear in lowercase and are place
	  holders for input from you.

Score

There are two Score commands: !Score and !ContScore.

Score loads and plays a .smus score.  The !Score command format is:

	!SCORE <"score.smus">["instrdir"] [FADE frames] [TEMPO speed]

	Where:

score .smus is the file name of the score you want to load.  The

				A-2

file must have the .smus extension.  If the score is not located in the
current directory, the full path name of the file must be included.

instrdir is only necessary if the instruments are not in the current
directory.  The full path name must be included.

FADE specifies the amount fo time to take to fade the sound from 0
(silence) to 255 (loudest).  Frames is the number of frames the fade takes
place over.

TEMPO establishes a default score tempo.

The !ContScore command continues a score that was stopped by the !STOP
command.  The score picks up where it left off.  The !ContScore command
format is:

!CONTSCORE

The following example illustrates a Score command that uses a score located
in another directory.  This command also specifies instruments that are not
in the current INSTRUMENTS directory, and sets the FADE time to 20 frames.

	!SCORE "STUDIO:SCORES/Factory.smus""STUDIO:SCORES/"
	FADE 20

Tempo

The Tempo command resets the Tempo of the current score.  The command
format is one of the following:

	!TEMPO nnn
	!TEMPO DEFAULT
	!TEMPO RESUME

				A-3

	Where:

	nnn is a number between 0 and 255 that sets the Tempo.  0 is the
	slowest tempo and 255 the fastest.

	DEFAULT sets the tempo back to the default score tempo.

	RESUME sets the tempo back to the previous tempo.

Volume

The Volume commands allow you to control the volume of a score, sfx, or an
instrument. These commands must be input before a NOTE or SFX command that
may refer to this command.  The volume for an SFX or Note cannot be changed
while the SFX or Note is playing.  The Volume command formats are:

	!VOLUME SCORE ["score"] [LEVEL volume] [FADE frames]

	!VOLUME SFX ["sfx.instr"] [LEVEl volume]

	!VOLUME NOTE [CHANNEL number] [LEVEL volume]

	Where:

	score is the name (or full path name, if necessary) of the score.

	LEVEL is the new volume, between 0 and 255.  Input the number in
	place of volume in the command line.

	FADE is the number of frames over which the volume change occurs.
	Input the number in place of frames in the command line.

	sfx.instr is the name of the instrument to be affected by the
	volume change.  If no name is given, the command defaults to the
	last SFX or Note command given.

				A-4

	CHANNEL is a value between 0 and 3.  The value specified determines
	the speaker setting for the selected note.  0 and 3 correspond to
	the right speaker, 1 and 2 correspond to the left speaker.

	The following example sets the current score to a new volume of
	128.

	!VOLUME SCORE LEVEL 128

SFX

The SFX command plays an IFF sound effect.  The sound must have the .instr
extension.  Unlike the !NOTE command, !SFX can play a sound effect at any
rate.  The command format is:

	!SFX ["sfx.instr"] [SPEED rate] [LOOP times] [CHANNEL <num
		|STEREO | ALL>]

	Where:

	sfx.instr is the path and file name of the IFF sound effect.  If
	this parameter is left blank, the last !NOTE or !SFX command plays.

	SPEED sets the speed of the Amiga cycle rate "rate".  Refer to 
	your hardware manual for more information.  A lower number gives a
	higher pitch and replay rate.  This number may be between 127 and
	32767.

	LOOP allows the sound to play multiple times.  Input the number in
	place of the term times in the command line.

	CHANNEL is a value between 0 and 3.  The value specified determines
	the speaker setting for the selected one.  0 and 3 correspond to
	the right speaker, 1 and 2 correspond to the left speaker.  The
	first time an !SFX or !NOTE command is used, a channel must be
	specified.

				A-5

	STEREO forces the sound to be played in stereo through channels 0
	and 2.

	ALL forces the sound to be played through all of the channels.
	This cuts off all other sounds and scores playing simultaneously.

	The following example uses the sound effect called boom.instr, 
	sets the speed to 400, and plays the sound through all speakers.

	!SFX "STUDIO:SCORES/boom.instr" SPEED 400 CHANNEL ALL

Note

	The Note command allows you to select and play a Sonix or IFF
instrument.  The command format is:

	!NOTE ["note.instr"] [KEY value] [OCTAVE n] [CHANNEL <num
		|STEREO |ALL>] [RELEASE]

	Where:

	note.instr is the full path name of the Sonix or IFF instrument 
	you want to play.  If you don't specify this, then the instrument
	defaults tot he last instrument or sound added.

	KEY sets the key "value" in which the note is to be played.  The
	notes available are: C, C#, Db, D, D#, Eb, E, F, F#, Gb, G, G#,
	Ab, A, A#, Bb, B.

	OCTAVE sets the octave of the instrument.  Some instruments can
	only be played at preset octaves.  Middle C is in Octave 5.

	CHANNEL is a value between 0 and 3.  The value specified determines
	the speaker setting for the selected note.  0 and 3 correspond to
	the right speaker, 1 and 2 correspond to the left speaker.

				A-6

	STEREO forces the sound to be played in stereo through channels 0
	and 2.

	ALL forces the sound to be played through all of the channels. 
	This cuts off all other sounds and scores playing simultaneously.

	RELEASE cuts a note off.  This option can be used with the !NOTE
	command to stop the last note played as in !NOTE RELEASE.

	To play two notes simultaneously, separate the commands with a
	color.  For example:

	!NOTE "STUDIO:SCORES/vibes.instr" KEY A CHANNEL 1 : !NOTE
	KEY F# CHANNEL 0

	To stop both notes simultaneously, separate the commands with a
	colon.

	!NOTE CHANNEL 1 RELEASE : !NOTE CHANNEL 0 RELEASE

				A-7

Stop

The Stop Commands stop the current score, sfx, or note.  Only scores can be
resumed using the !CONTSCORE command.  The command formats are:

	!STOP SCORE
	!STOP SFX [CHANNEL <num |STEREO |ALL>]

	!STOP NOTE [CHANNEL <num |STEREO |ALL>]

	Where:

	CHANNEL is a value between 0 and 3.  The value specified determines
	the speaker setting for the selected note.  0 and 3 correspond to
	the right speaker, 1 and 2 correspond to the left speaker.

	STEREO forces the sound to be stopped in channels 0 and 2.

	ALL forces the sound to be stopped through all of the channels.
	This cuts off all other sounds and scores playing simultaneously.

	Be sure that the ! (exclamation point) precedes each of the main
	command words.

				A-8

                             Appendix B
                      
                          File Operations

This appendix provides information on file extensions and instructions on
exporting files to video.

File Extensions

The following list provides descriptions of the file extensions applicable
to The Animation Studio.

	Extension	Type

	.expo		Exposure Sheet
	.anim		Anim format, saved in another application*
	.IFF		IFF format*
	.CFast		The Animation Studio*
	.info		Icon files that cannot be opened
	.smus		Music score saved in Sonix
	.instr		Sonix instrument

* We recommend that you name your files with these extensions so you can
easily recognize the file type.  This is useful when loading or opening
files.  Since Ink & Paint does not append a unique file extension to a
color file, we also recommend you assign a .color extension to painted
files.

				B-1

CFast is a proprietary file format specific to The Animation Studio.  It
saves the Exposure Sheet file as part of the animation file.  This format
allows you to save music and sound effects commands.  CFast tends to create
larger disk files, so use the Anim file format when saving large
animations.

Anim is a widely used format in the Amiga animation world.  Animations
saved as Anim files can be shown in other animation programs, and The
Animation Studio can play Anim files from other animation programs.  If an
animation is saved from the Exposure Sheet, the Anim file format can save
the timing of the animation, but cannot save the Exposure Sheet as part of
the file.  Consequently, color animations saved as Anim files cannot play
sound.

IFF is a different file format from the Anim format in that it saves each
cel of the animation as a separate file.  All of the saved cels are
included in one subdirectory.  This is a universal format, since it can
make use of single cels from most Amiga paint packages.

                          Files to Video

Animations created in The Animation Studio can be output to a VCR and
viewed on your television.  It is not necessary to create one large
animation in The Animation Studio at one time if you plan to output the
animation to video.  You could save memory by creating small sections of
the animation, and output each section to video, using the video as the
storage medium.  We recommend using a VCR with flying erase heads for
smooth editing.

				B-2

When using an Amiga 1000:
Connect the computer video output to the VCR video input using an RCA patch
cord.

When using an Amiga 500, 2000, 2500:
You need an RGB to NTSC converter.  This converter allows you to connect an
RCA patch cord between the Amiga output and the VCR.

You may also connect the computer audio output to your VCR audio input.

				B-3

                            Appendix C

                        Keyboard Commands

Pencil Test

Be sure to note the upper and lower 
case of the keys.

Function		Key		Function		Key

Project Menu				Edit Menu
New.................... N		Undo..................... u
Open >>CFAST........... o		Restore.................. U
Save................... S		Swap..................... j
Save As >> CFAST....... w		Invert................... ~
Animate................ a		Insert................... i
About.................. ?		Copy..................... O
					Paste.................... P
					Clear.................... K
					Go to.................... g

Brush Menu

Rotate >> 45 degrees.. $
	  90 degrees.. (
					Tools Menu
Resize >> Halve....... h		
	  Double...... H		Freehand Line............ d
	  Wider....... X                Dotted Line.............. s
	  Taller...... Y		Line..................... v
	  Size........ Z		Curve.................... q
Flip >> Horiz......... x		Outline Circle........... c
        Vert.......... y		Filled Circle............ C
Font >> Load.......... T		Outline Ellipse.......... e
					Filled Ellipse........... E
					Outline Rectangle........ r
					Filled Rectangle......... R
					Text..................... t
					Fill on Color............ f
					Brush.................... b
					Magnify.................. m

				C-1

                      Pencil Test (continued)

	Function		Key

	Tools Menu

	Zoom In.................. >
	Zoom Out................. <

	Preferences Menu

	Frame rate............... F
	Fade Colors >> Invert.... !
		Fade In.......... ]
		Fade Out......... [
	Coordinates.............. | (vertical bar)

	Help Key

	Previous cel............. Left Arrow
	Next cel................. Right Arrow
	First cel................ Up Arrow
	Last cel................. Down Arrow
	Move forward and
	copy cel................. Return
	Delete current cel....... Del
	Display memory........... F1
	Toggle onion skin effect. F2
	Toggle Loop Lock......... F3
	Set jump-to cel.......... F4
	Enter Ink & Paint........ F5
	Enter Exposure Sheet..... F6
	Clean up cel............. F7
	Toggle mouse pointer..... F8
	Toggle menu bar.......... F9
	Toggle menu bar and
		Toolbox.......... F10
	Quit..................... Esc

				C-2

                           Exposure Sheet

	The A stands for the Amiga key located on the lower
	right corner of your keyboard.  Hold the Amiga key 
	while pressing the corresponding key.

	Function		Key

	Project Menu

	New.................... A n
	Open................... A o
	Save................... A w
	Animate................ A a
	About.................. A ?

	Edit Menu

	Copy................... A c
	Cut.................... A x
	Paste.................. A i
	Sparse................. A f
	Search................. A s
	Search Again........... A g
	Block.................. A b
	First/Last Frame....... A t

	Help Key

	Previous Page.......... SHIFT up arrow
	Next Page.............. SHIFT down arrow
	Return to Pencil Test.. F6

				C-3

	Palette................ p

			   Ink & Paint

	Function		Key	Function		Key

	Project Menu			Tools Menu

	New.................... N	Freehand Line............ d
	Open >> Cfast.......... o	Line..................... v
	Save................... S	Filled Rectangle......... r
	Save As>>Cfast......... w	Dithered Rectangle....... R
	Animate................ a	Fill on Color............ f
	About.................. ?	Dither Fill.............. F
					Magnify.................. m
					Zoom In.................. >
					Zoom Out................. <

	Edit Menu

	Undo.................. u
	Restore............... U	Help Key
	Clear................. K
	Go To................. g	Previous cel.......... Left arrow
					Next cel.............. Right arrow
					First cel............. Up arrow
	Camera Menu			Last cel.............. Down arrow
					Display Memory........ F1
	Frisket............... ~	Start Pencil Test..... F5
	In Use................ `	Toggle menu bar....... F9
					Toggle menu bar
						and Toolbox... F10
					Toggle Color Cycling.. TAB
					Quit program.......... ESC

				C-4

                             Appendix D

                     Troubleshooting Checklist

If you encounter any problems with the software program, check the
following items before calling Walt Disney Computer Software Customer
Service.

	* Did you follow the installation instructions provided in the
	  Getting Started manual?

	* Is the program disk inserted properly in the disk drive with the
	  label side up?

	* Does your computer meet the system requirements listed in The
	  Animation Studio Installation Chapter?

	* Is each component of your computer system (computer, monitor,
	  disk drive) turned on?  Refer to the installation instructions
	  in the Amiga documentation supplied with your computer.

	* Is each component of your computer system (mouse, power cord,
	  monitor) connected correctly?  Is the mouse ball clean and in
	  place?  Refer to the installation instructions in the Amiga
	  documentation supplied with your computer.

				D-1

If the colors do not appear as expected:

	* Are the monitor's contrast, color, and tint controls adjusted
	  properly?

If the sound is not functioning properly:

	* Have you checked the computer cable connections?

	* Is the volume control adjusted correctly?

if the problem still exists, call Walt Disney Computer Software Customer
Service at (818) 841-3326.  Please have all the information related to the
problem, including the inventory number found on the back of this manual,
and the software version number, ready before calling Customer Service. 
This will make it easier for our service representative to understand the
problem and offer assistance.

If you need to return your disk replacement, please mail only the disk,
along with your name and address.  We will replace your disk at no charge
within ninety days after purchase, provided you have mailed in your
warranty card.  Please allow 3 to 4 weeks for delivery.

				D-2

                           Bibliography

Animation, Preston Blair, Walter T. Foster, Art Books, Tustin, CA

The Art of Animation, Bob Thomas, New York; Simon & Shuster, 1958.

The Complete Kodak Animation Book, Ron Stark and Charles Soloman,
Rochester, New York; Eastman Kodak Company, 1983.

Disney Animation: The Illusion of Life, Frank Thomas and Ollie Johnston,
New York; Abbeville Press, 1981.

Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs & the Making of the Classic Film, Richard
Holliss and Brian Sibley, New York; Simon & Shuster, 1987.

Too Funny for Words; Disney's Greatest Sight Gags, Frank Thomas and Ollie
Johnston, New York; Abbeville Press, 1987.

Walt Disney and Assorted Other Characters, Jack Kinney, Harmony, 1988.

				Bibliography - 1

                          	   Glossary

Anim 		

A widely used file format in the Amiga animation world.

Anticipation	

The specific movement, whether subtle or broad, preceding a major action,
which leads the eye through the sequence of motions clearly.  It is the
idea that, "before you go one way, you must go the other way first."  This
principle is evident in almost every action.  The exaggerated wind-up to a
cartoon run as shown in the illustration, is a good example of this
principle applied to animation.

		           Figure G-1. Anticipation

Appeal		

The overall effect of pleasing design, strong drawing, simple, pleasing
shapes, and clear communication, which give a character magnetism.  If the
audience does not want to look at a character, communication is lost.

				Glossary - 1

Arcs		

Plotting of the slightly circular path followed by most living creature's
movements.  This creates pleasing designs in a two-dimensional path of
action, and gives fluidity to the movements.

Backup		

To make a spare copy of a disk or a file on a disk.  It is a good idea to
make backup copies of original files and  disks that are important to you.

Cel		

Technically, a cel is a painting of the drawn animation on celuloid.  A cel
also refers to a single piece of artwork drawn on acetate or onion skin
paper.  In The Animation Studio package, a cel is a single piece of artwork
drawn on one layer displayed on the screen.

CFast		

A proprietary file format specific to The Animation Studio.

Characterization

The personality of a character.  The special quality, in attitude or
behavior, that makes a character unique.

Click

To position the mouse pointer on something, press and quickly release the
button.

CLI (Command Line Interface)

The CLI allows you to issue commands to perform disk operations and file
manipulations using the Amiga DOS.  The CLI commands are typed at the
keyboard and appear in the CLI window.

Drag

The process of holding the mouse button down, moving the mouse, and
releasing the mouse button.

Dithering

A technique that alternates the values of dots or pixels to create an
intermediate value.

Effects Animation

The non-character elements of an animated film that require movement. 
Elements such as bubbles, lights, cars, shadows, etc.

				Glossary - 2

Exaggeration

Finding the central concept of an action or sequence, and caricaturing,
developing, and highlighting its essence for clarity.  poses can also be
pushed well beyond reality.  Unlike live-action, the artists can control
exactly what the audience will see.

Exposure Sheet

In traditional animation, the exposure sheet is a guideline by which the
animators setup timing and events.  It is similar to a list of things to do
and when to do them.  The Animation Studio exposure sheet includes the
computer commands which control timing, sounds, and music.

Flesh out

To add more detail to the drawing, animation, etc.

Follow Through and Overlapping Action

The continued movement of a character's body, limbs, or clothing after the
figure has stopped and settled into a final or "held" position.  This gives
weight, solidity, and believability to the figure.  It keeps the action
from becoming stiff and frozen, and also can provide the humorous "gag".

Frame

A single still picture in a film.  There are 24 frames per second in
conventional film making, which means that 24 frames pass in front of the
film projector every second.  Often, animation is shown in twos:  each cel
is shown twice, once every other frame.  This depends on the timing
requirements of the animation.  Video standards use 30 frames per second.

Frisket

An art term for a masking sheet used in painting or airbrushing.  This
masking sheet is used to prevent paint from getting on protected parts of
the artwork during creation.  For example, if you were painting a landscape
scene which had a blue sky and a green horizon, a frisket might be used to
mask out the blue sky while you painted the green of the horizon.

Gag

A humorous cartoon, picture, or short animation.

				Glossary - 3

Icon

A symbol that represents an object, concept, function, or tool.

In-betweener

The animator who adds the in-between steps or drawings of an animation. 
See In-between Method.

In-between Method

The drawings made between extremes for the purpose of "carrying" the action
of a character through smoothly.  You may only have one drawing between two
extremes, or you may have seven or more, but the best method is to create
the middle drawing first.

			Figure G-2. In-betweening

The process of always making the middle drawing first and continuing to
split the action in half is a basic technique in the animated cartoon
field.  The animator who creates these drawings is called an In-betweener.

				Glossary - 4

IFF

A file format that saves each cel of an animation as a separate file.  All
of the saved cels are included in one directory.  IFF is considered a
universal file format since it can make use of single cels from most Amiga
paint packages.

.info

Icon files that cannot be opened in The Animation Studio.

Instruments

Either digitized or synthesized sounds.  When played at different speeds,
they compose the notes of a score.  Digitized instruments are usually used
to create interesting and different sound effects.  Sounds of a human voice
and sound effects taken from things other than musical instruments are also
used.  Synthesized sounds are computer generated and are sometimes
preferred over digitize instruments because they use less computer memory.

Menu bar

The horizontal strip at the top of the screen that contains menu titles.

Menu item

A choice in a menu, which usually selects a command, function, or
requester.

Menu title

A word or phrase in the menu bar that designates one menu.  Selecting the
menu title causes the title to be highlighted and its menu to appear below
it.

Morgue

The place where an animation studio saves all cels, drawings, and artwork.

Multi-plane camera

A device created by the Walt Disney Studio to simulate a three-dimensional
effect in animation.  The environment is painted on separate layers of
glass and shot with a deep-focus lens.

Path of action

The designated pattern that a character or shape follows in its action.

Requester

A window that displays on screen asking you for input.

				Glossary - 5

Rough

A very loose freehand drawing used to develop a character or setting.

			Figure G-3. Rough Character Sketch

Score

The musical sound track of a motion picture.

Secondary Action

Minor movements or actions within the figure which reinforce the main idea
of the major action.  For example, blushing is a secondary action to the
main action of head-ducking to indicate shyness.

Silhouette Test

A long standing rule in animation is that a good extreme pose should read
in silhouette.  This means that you should be able to "black in" the pose
and still clearly see what the character is doing.  The reason for this
rule is that on the motion picture

				Glossary - 6

screen, you do not have the opportunity to study each pose as you do in
many other types of artwork.  The impression of each key pose must
therefore be as clear and unmistakable as you can make it.

			Figure G-4. Silhouette Test

Slow In and Slow Out

The timing of in-between drawings between key poses to move from one
extreme to the next.  More drawings are planned near each major pose or
action to keep each movement from being timed too evenly.

Solid Drawing

The ability to draw and render well, giving each drawing weight, depth,
balance, and clarity.  There is no way to overstate the importance of solid
draftsmanship.

				Glossary - 7

Squash and Stretch

The contracting and expanding movement within a shape as it progresses
through an action, showing elasticity and volume.  Without this, the
characters would seem stiff and mechanical.  The squashing and stretching
of forms is a basic principle found in nature.  A slow motion camera often
reveals the extent to which forms are distorted in natural action.  The
animator must exaggerate these shape changes.  A good rule to remember is
that the volume should remain approximately the same whether the form is
squashed or stretched.

		     Figure G-5. Squash and Stretch

Staging

The way a story is composed, a design for the action, and the camera angle
used.  Staging is important in conveying meaning, mood, emotion, and
relationship to the story.

			     Glossary - 8

Storyboards

Large boards on which sketches showing every stage of the action, story,
and character development can be displayed for discussion, revision, and
acceptance of the story and characters.  Storyboards are like very detailed
comic strips and are one of animation's most crucial tools.  They allow
film makers to visualize cartoon action that would be difficult to
describe.  All of the conceptual elements of a cartoon are integrated and
reworked until the complete film is shown in a series of drawings.  The
storyboard becomes the actual script of an animated film.

Story reel

A series of sketches that simulate movement, with dialog and sound effects
added, somewhat like a comic strip.  The storyboard is timed and shot to
approximate the finished film.  The film makes can see a "rough" version of
the movie he plans to make before the creation of the animation begins.

Story structure

The simplified, overall sequence of events in the story line.  Generally a
plot divided into three acts.

Straight Ahead Action and Pose to Pose

Straight ahead action is a working technique for animators who work
straight through a sequence from beginning to end as ideas occur to them,
gaining spontaneity.  In pose to pose action, animators first decide
exactly which major movements and actions are needed, and they draw them
first.  The animator then fills in the remaining frames with "in-between"
actions.  This allows for more planned, dramatic acting.

Synchronized sound

The process of matching, frame for frame, a sound track to film, giving the
illusion of a talking picture.

Timing

Determined by the number of drawings used in any movement sequence, timing
is the rhythm or pacing of the action or acting on screen.  Used to express
character and mood, timing can affect the meaning of the action.

				Glossary - 9

Toolbox

The box on the right side of The Animation Studio Pencil Test and Ink &
Paint screens that provide icons of the drawing tools, and functions
available.

Voice Casting

The process of selecting actors, actresses, or other voice professionals to
be the voices of animated characters.

Window

The area that displays information on your monitor.

				Glossary - 10

                                   Index

A

About  3-12, 4-7, 5-9
Adjusting the Frame Rate  4-18
Advanced Animation Techniques  6-16
Anim  B-1
Animate  3-12, 5-8, 6-5
Animating your Character  6-5
Anticipation  6-16
Arcs  6-15
Auto Remap  5-34

B

Basic Animation Techniques  6-10
Biped Run  6-17
Biped Walk  6-17
Block  4-9
Brush  3-22, 3-37

C

Camera  2-7, 5-29
CFast  B-1
CLI  2-2
Color Cycling  5-27
Contents of The Animation Studio Program  2-1, 2-2
Creating a Drawing  3-52
Creating a Pencil Test Animation  3-52
Creating an Exposure Sheet  4-16
Creating Cel Sequences  3-53
Creating Color Spreads  5-19
Creating or Modifying Colors  5-18
Creating Ranges  5-20
Customer Service  D-2

D

Disney History  1-1
	Final Production  1-10
	In-betweening  1-9
	Layout  1-8
	Roughs  1-6, 6-2
	Storyboards  1-7
	The Disney Process  1-6
Dither Box  5-17
Dither Fill  5-14
Dithering  5-14

E

Example Animations  6-10, 6-12
Exposure Sheet  2-5, 4-1
	Adjusting the Frame Rate  4-18
	Commands  4-14, A-1
	Creating an Exposure Sheet  4-16
	Help Key  4-14
	How to Use the Exposure Sheet  4-16
	Instruments  4-12
	Menus  4-3
	Screen Elements  4-2
	Score  A-2

				Index - 1

Exposure Sheet Project Menu  4-4
	About  4-7
	Animate  4-6
	Append  4-5
	New  4-5
	Open  4-5
	Pencil Test  4-7
	Print  4-6
	Save  4-5
	Save As  4-6
	Save by Sheet  4-6

Exposure Sheet Edit Menu  4-7
	Block  4-9
	Copy 4-8
	Cut 4-8
	First/Last Frame 4-10
	Paste 4-8
	Search 4-9
	Search Again 4-9
	Sparse 4-8

Exposure Sheet Preview Menu  4-10
	Flush Music  4-12
	Instrument 4-12
	Score 4-11

Extremes  6-7

F

Fade Colors  3-47
Files  B-1
Fill  3-37, 5-13, 5-15, 5-16
Flick 5-8
Flicker  5-8
Flush Fonts  3-30
Flush Music  4-13
Flying  6-18
Fonts  3-29
Frame Rate  3-45
Frisket  5-30

G

Got  3-20, 5-11
Grab From  3-29

H

Help Key  2-9, 3-49, 4-14, 5-26
How to Ink & Paint Your Animation  5-25

I

In-betweening  1-9, 6-12
Ink & Paint  2-6, 5-1
	Help Key  5-26
	How to Ink & Paint Your Animation  5-25
	Menus  5-2
	Screen Elements  2-5, 5-1
	Tools  5-12

Ink & Paint Camera Menu  5-29
	Auto Remap  5-34
	Cancel  5-31
	Clear  5-31
	Copy Forward  5-34
	Copy to All  5-34
	Copy Reverse  5-34
	Default  5-34
	Free  5-32
	Frisket  5-30
	In Use  5-32
	Invert  5-31
	Map to  5-35
	Palette  5-32
	Use  5-31

				Index - 2

Ink & Paint Edit Menu  5-10
	Clear  5-11
	Goto  5-11
	Load Background  5-11
	Restore  5-10
	Save  5-11
	Undo  5-10

Ink & Paint Preferences Menu  5-23
	NTSC Filter  5-24
	Set # of Colors  5-23
	Toolbox  5-24

Ink & Paint Project Menu  5-3
	About  5-9
	Animate  5-8
	Append  5-6
	New  5-4
	Open  5-4
	Pencil Test  5-9
	Quit  5-9
	Save  5-6
	Save As  5-6
	Secure  5-7

Ink & Paint Tools Menu  5-12
	Cancel 5-22
	Clear  5-16
	Color Palette  5-17
	Dither Box  5-17
	Dither Fill  5-14
	Fill on Color  5-13
	Fill to Color  5-15
	Freehand Line  5-12
	Line  5-13
	Magnify  5-16
	OK  5-22
	Rectangle  5-13
	Remap  5-22
	Undo  5-16, 5-22
	Zoom  5-17

J

J-screen Technique  3-15, 6-8, 6-9

K

Keyboard Commands  C-1

L

Limited Animation  3-54, 6-5
Line  3-34, 5-12, 5-13
Load  3-22
Load Cel  3-20
Loop Lock  3-50

M

Magnify  3-40, 5-16
Morgue Disk  2-1
Mouse and Keyboard Functions  2-8
Mouth Chart  6-6
Moving Colors in the Palette  5-19

N

NTSC Filter  5-24

O 

Opening a File  3-8
Output to Video  B-2

				Index - 3

P

Palette  5-32
	Cancel  5-33
	Cycle Direction  5-33
	Frame  5-33
	OK  5-34
	Remap  5-33
	Speed Slider  5-34
	Undo  5-33

Path of Action  6-15

Pencil Test  2-2, 3-1, 6-3
	Cel  2-5
	Help Key  2-9, 3-49
	Menu Bar  2-3
	Menu Titles  2-3, 3-3
	Toolbox  2-4, 3-32

Pencil Test Brush Menu  3-22
	Flip  3-27
	Font  3-29
	Grab Form  3-29
	Load  3-22
	Resize  3-23
	Rotate  3-23
	Save  3-22

Pencil Test Edit Menu  3-14
	Cleanup  3-19
	Clear  3-20
	Copy  3-19
	Delete  3-19
	Goto  3-20
	Insert  3-19
	Invert  3-18
	Load Cel  3-20
	Paste  3-20
	Restore  3-15
	Save Cel  3-21
	Swap  3-15
	Undo  3-14

Pencil Test Preferences Menu  3-43
	Coords  3-48
	Fade Colors  3-47
	Frame Rate  3-45
	Screen Format  3-44
	Set Colors  3-46
	Set 0,0  3-48
	Show Load  3-48
	Toolbox  3-48

Pencil Test Project Menu  3-5
	About  3-12
	Animate  3-12
	Append  3-10
	Exposure Sheet  3-12
	Ink & Paint  3-12
	New  3-5
	Open  3-7
	Quit  3-13
	Save  3-10
	Save As  3-11

Pencil Test Tools Menu  3-31
	Back Arrow  3-41
	Brush  3-37
	Circle  3-35
	Clear  3-39
	Copy from Buffer  3-41
	Copy to Buffer  3-40
	Curve  3-34
	Delete Cel  3-41
	Dotted Line  3-34
	Ellipse  3-35

				Index - 4

	Exposure Sheet  3-42
	Fill  3-37
	Forward Arrow  3-42
	Freehand Line  3-33
	Insert Blank Cel  3-41
	Line  3-34
	Magnify  3-40
	Projector  3-42
	Rectangle  3-36
	Text  3-36
	Undo  3-39
	Zoom  3-40

Q

Quadruped Run  6-17
Quadruped Walk  6-17
Quit  3-13, 5-9

R

Rectangle  3-36, 5-13
Reference Animations  6-10, 6-11
Resize  3-23
Restore  3-15, 5-10
Rotate  3-23

S

Save  3-10, 3-22, 4-5, 5-11
Save As  3-11, 4-6, 5-6
Save by Sheet  4-6
Save Cel  3-21
Score Commands  A-2
Search  4-9
Search Again  4-9
Secure  5-7
Set 0,0  3-48
Set Colors  3-46, 5-23
Show Load  3-48
Silhouette Test  6-13
Sound Effects  4-14, 4-15, A-1
Sparse  4-8
Speed, cycling  5-34
Storyboard  1-7
Swap Screen Techniques  3-15, 6-8, 6-9

T

Testing the Animation Sequence  3-55
Text  3-36
Tools  2-4, 3-31, 3-32, 5-12
Troubleshooting Checklist  D-1
Types of Movement  3-54, 6-5

U

Undo  3-14, 3-39, 5-16, 5-33

				Index - 5


